<comment>Thank you so much for your scholarship and hard work on this - quite edifying!  It's clear that actually researching an article before writing it is a winning strategy - hopefully some other Atlantic authors will follow suit.</comment>

<comment>the amusing thing about the Cruz situation is that some birthers will go apeshit over this, rather than worrying about whether Cruz might make an objectively good president.  Of course, the answer is "no, Cruz would be a debacle" but that has to do with the quality of his character, not the Calgary-ness of his nativity.</comment>

<comment>When you base your opinion on political ideology loyalty, liberal bias -Democrat Liberalism, Socialism, Collectivism, Statism, Welfarism, ie; an all powerful centralized govt, dictating, via laws, regulations, edicts, executive orders, etc, every aspect of the citizenry people's lives from cradle to grave..  as opposed to American Constitutionalism, Republicanism, Limited govt Of, By, and For the We the People..  Where the sanctity of individual is sovereign..  Where The People's Rights are Unalienable (God Given Natural Rights), (not govt granted), where self-determination dictates a person's destiny, not govt..  Where we the people hold elected officials accountable to the Will of the People.. thus this is what you say- naturally labeling Ted Cruz as you have, denigrating Ted Cruz's character as you have, mocking the very truth as you so innocously casually have, instead of facts of evidence truth to reality that you apparently seem to deny and ignore.</comment>

<comment>In my opinion, Cruz would make a terrible president.  I get to have that opinion, and you totally get to disagree if you'd like.Whether or not Cruz is eligible to be president I'm not so concerned about.  If the best possible president we could have was born on Mars to a Venusian mother and a Betelgeusian father, then that's the president I'd want to have.</comment>

<comment>Ted Cruz is simply not a natural born citizen of the United States. The exact definition of that term is found in "Law of Nations", the reference book used by the Founders from 1775 on, and still used by our Congress and Supreme Court today."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Good grief. This again.https://norredlaw.com/2015/04/...</comment>

<comment>Boy, are you confused. Or, trying to confuse the issue. Are you a friend of Jack Maskell?</comment>

<comment>I'll help you to understand something you commented on but obviously did not comprehend.You assert Vattel wasn't serious about his definition of "natural born citizen" and your evidence is that he talks of respecting the citizenship laws of other nations when a child is born there.>> First, we need to recognize that Vattel states that the various laws of the various countries are established and must be followed. <<See if you can follow this.The definition of natural born citizen precludes birth in any other nation that would burden the child under the laws and allegiances of that nation. That is WHY the Founders made it the requirement to be President of the United States.Vattel was very serious about the difference between natural born citizen and the status of citizen. So were the Founders.</comment>

<comment>You stated>> I can state that I could not find any limiting language in any Founding Era documentation that clearly supports or argues against the idea that Congress can define "natural-born citizen" any way it wishes.<<Because they can't. If they were allowed to, the Constitution would say so. The Constitution permitted them to make rules for naturalization and such but the definition of "natural-born citizen" was clearly documented and was not a legislative act. It is a natural state of being. A person born in a nation of parents who are citizens of that nation cannot, by nature, be anything but a citizen of that nation and no other.The definition is so clearly stated and was so well known by 1787 that there was no need to debate it when making it a requirement for the Presidency."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>More clarification... since words seem to confuse you. You stated, regarding the Naturalization Act of 1790...>> because the Act uses that phrase in the very next sentence to clarify that the children of citizens are "natural born citizens", wherever they are born <<No. It does not say they "are" natural born citizens. It says they shall be "considered as" natural born citizens. Why?Some of the Founders were spending years abroad as ambassadors and did not want their own children, born abroad, to be disqualified from the Presidency.  It would be fair to say this notion had some basis in English common law, which asserted:"And therefore if any of the King's ambassadors in foreign nations, have children there of their wives, being English women, by the common laws of England they are natural-born subjects, and yet they are born out-of the King's dominions."The peril of birth under foreign jurisdiction and laws (well documented by Vattel) was understood and the 1790 Act was fully repealed in 1795. Those who can qualify since then ARE natural born citizens. By definition."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>In the 1790s "considered as" meant the same as "are".  Thus in the 1790 Act naturalized persons "shall be considered as" citizens of the United States and the children of naturalized persons "shall be considered as" citizens of the United States.</comment>

<comment>In the 1790s, "shall be considered as" meant the same thing as it does now. The words "are" and "is" are both used frequently, where they are meant. For example, in the definition of "natural born citizen", which defines people who ARE..."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>So you are saying that in the 1790 Act naturalized persons are not citizens, they are only considered as citizens.  Or you are saying that in mid paragraph the Founders changed the meaning of "considered as" from "are" to "sigma liar but not the same as".  ROFLMAOHere is what Zephaniah Swift wrote in 1795:"THE people are considered as aliens, born in some foreign country, as inhabitants of some neighbouring state in the union, or natural born subjects, born within the state.”So are aliens people born in an foreign country or just similar to people born in a foreign country?More about Swift in another response</comment>

<comment>Yes, a person made a citizen by law is only "considered as" a citizen, a status conferred by law not by birth. Yet, such a person enjoys all the same rights and privileges as a natural born citizen except eligibility to be President."The citizenship of no man could be previous to the declaration of independence, and, as a natural right, belongs to none but those who have been born of citizens since the 4th of July, 1776." - David Ramsay, 1789, Dissertation on the nature of citizenshipZephaniah's sloppy use of language does NOT change the US Constitution, which requires the President be a "natural born citizen". There is only one definition, so you can't get it wrong unless you try."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>So you consider it sloppy use of language when Madison wrote in Federalist 54 , "Slaves are considered as property, not as persons."?  Or are you saying that slaves were not property?BTW, did you know that James Madison said that Dr. Ramsay was wrong?</comment>

<comment>C. Hughes is actually correct here.  To say "shall be considered as" is different than "are" or "is" is to say that the 1795 Act was only saying he children of U.S. citizens born abroad were not actually citizens, only "considered as" citizens.  Which is of course nonsense.</comment>

<comment>I am sure you will deny this until your dying day, but the authors of the constitution did not use, nor reference, Vattel in writing the constitution.   To call it "the reference book the Founders used when writing the Constitution" is beyond absurd.Vattel was mentioned by one person, one day, very early on in the Constitutional Convention, as one in a list of four or five authors who would confirm that nations and states had equal "one-vote-per-state" standing in international relations.  Meaning, the influence and political power of different states should be judged not by size of population but should be equal among all states, small or large, as they were under the Articles of Confederation.  This argument touches on the standard concept in international affairs that small and large nations are equally represented as one whole each.  It makes sense to conjure Vattel since Vattel's subject matter was indeed the relations between nations of the world.Other than that one reference, neither Vattel nor any of the content of his treatise is referenced or cited or discussed in any way whatsoever through the entire convention.  Nothing at all of his descriptions can be discerned in the text of the Constitution or the powers delegated by it, nor in the structure of the government, or the rules of its operation.  This is because Vattel is irrelevant on domestic issues.  Vattel's Law of Nations would not even pretend to be authoritative on any of the content of the Constitution.Read the debates.  You'll see there was no "reference book."I have challenged others to try something and I will offer you the same opportunity:  Show any concepts or phrases and ideas in the Constitution which could arguably be construed to have originated in Vattel's Law of Nations.  Go for it.  Make a list.  Is it the structure of the bicameral legislature?    The supremacy of the federal judiciary?  The commerce clause?  I means, SURELY there should be many obvious confirmations within the Constitution itself that Vattel's treatise was "the reference book" used to craft it, correct?Good luck with that.In the meantime, let's also make note of the fact that the phrase "natural born citizen" was never proposed or discussed by ANY of the delegates at the convention itself.  None.  Not once.  Nor was there any proposal or discussion by those delegates even touching on the idea that the qualifications for president should be elevated above those proposed generally for the members of the House and Senate.  Meaning, the qualifications included that they be citizens for a minimum number of years before taking office, obviously contemplating that they could have been immigrating aliens who had naturalized at some point.Exactly what length of citizenship would be required for each office was referred to a committee.There were two drafts of the constitution which came out of committees who were tasked with putting into text the resolves of the convention from all the discussions, proposals, votes on various clauses and sections.  There was a first, and then a final.  The first draft didn't say anything about the qualifications for the President.  Nothing about birth, citizenship, allegiance, etc.The main check against foreign influence, and what was called "cabal" (the forming together groups of influence in secret) among the states and legislatures, was in HOW the President was to be elected or appointed, not in who that person was.  The delegates argued for WEEKS about whether or not the president should be appointed by the legislature, or elected by electors appointed by the legislature, or by state legislatures, or their governors, or a direct vote of the people, or a nomination by the Senate and vote in the House, or even election by a select committee of 15 taken from the body of the House via a lottery - basically drawing straws.  Of all that discussion about which would best thwart either the legislatures or foreigners from having too much influence on the president, or whether one term of 14 or 20 years with no repeat eligibility would be a better idea than one 6-year term per every 12 years, there was literally NOT A WORD about birth citizenship, or dual allegiances, or birth on the soil to parent citizens.  NONE.It seems that you and the vast majority of Vattelians have never bothered to read the conversations in the notes of the Constitutional Convention.  This is all very clear.Even leading up to the Committee's second and final draft o the Constitution, no discussion was made of the president's eligibility in such terms.  The only discussions of the eligibility of the president was the number of years the person should have been a citizen before being president.  Like the senate and the house.It was only when John Jay sent the letter to Washington that the term "natural born citizen" was ever proposed.  John Jay who practiced under the common law and was the first chief justice of the supreme court.  The phrase, after showing up in the letter, was inserted by the second committee, without comment.In short, the term "natural born citizen" was never brought up by a single delegate, was inserted without comment in the final draft, and didn't attract a single bit of notice ever after it became part of the final draft for review.</comment>

<comment>Can we really take the chance?  Trump says we cannot, and he is pretty much always right.EDIT:  To whomever upvoted me, that was sarcasm.</comment>

<comment>^Fake Moto/Anita/Esther/God Almighty/etc. are cloning accounts. Check number of posts. And he seemed like such a nice old lady!Edit: This display name has been changed from "Spudwhisperer" a fake "spudwhisperer" account (a violation of Disqus rules) to "Callie Shaw" to cover Motoboto Haritoto's tracks. </comment>

<comment>Yup, the real spudwhisperer spells his name in lower case.</comment>

<comment>That being said, Trump does have a point here (I know, I am as surprised to type this as you are).</comment>

<comment>Even a stopped clock is correct twice a day.</comment>

<comment>I find your lack of faith disturbing my dear friend.</comment>

<comment>It's not even about "taking a chance". Cruz is definitely not a natural born citizen of the United States. Neither are Obama or Rubio. Having a foreign Father at birth disqualifies all three of them and Cruz is disqualified by birth outside US Jurisdiction.This is the exact definition of "natural born citizen" in the reference book the Founders used when writing the Constitution."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Nope. No matter how many times you say it. https://norredlaw.com/2015/04/...</comment>

<comment>Yeah, I dug through that load of obfuscation and BS.You'll never escape the facts:1) The Founders relied upon Law of Nations from 1775 on to craft this nation's founding documents2) Over a decade later, when writing the Constitution, they were clearly familiar with its content3) By that time it was a common textbook in American universities, so the American People would also be familiar with the terminology found in Law of Nations that was used in our Constitution.4) It is still in print today and still used by our Supreme Court and legal profession as a reference to the Constitution. Last case I found was 2012.5) Law of Nations provides the ONLY definition of "natural born citizen" known to the Founders."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Sorry sorry but that is not true.  Some facts:1) During the Constitutional Convention, Blackstone's Commentaries was used as a reference for legal concepts and terms (Madison's notes on the Federal convention).2). The terms natural born citizen and natural born subject were used interchangeably between 1780 and 1791 (for example the Massachusetts' Acts of Naturalization).3) Alexander Hamilton (a delegate to the Constitutional Convention) wrote that the meaning of terms in the Constitution can be found in the English legal system (1795 legal brief).4) the term natural born citizen did not appear in Vattel's Law of Nations until the 1797 edition.  </comment>

<comment>1) Blackstone's commentaries provided no definition of "natural born citizen". It did, however, comment on "natural born subject" to the King which is the Status the Revolution freed Americans from.2) To be a "natural born subject" has a meaning entirely different from being a "natural born citizen". The Founders used the term "natural born citizen" and there is only ONE source that provides the definition, "Law of Nations".3) The meaning of SOME terms in the Constitution may be found in English common law. "Natural Born Citizen" is not one of them.4) The exact definition of "natural born citizen" appeared in Vattel's "Law of Nations" in the original 1758 French edition. The English Translation did not modify the meaning, it only sought the correct words to convey it in the English language.In the paragraph explaining the nature of a CITIZEN (not a subject), Vattel provides the definition:Original French: "Les naturels, ou indigenes, sont ceux qui sont nes dans le pays, de parens citoyens"Literal: "The natural, or indigenous, are those who are born in the country, of parents who are citizens"Official English Translation: "The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Then explain why the Massachusetts Acts of Naturalization used both terms interchangeably.These acts prove beyond any doubt that to the Founders natural born subject and natural born citizen meant the same thing.Here is a summary:February, 1785, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING NICHOLAS ROUSSELET AND GEORGE SMITH.” in which it was declared that Nicholas Rousselet and George Smith “shall be deemed, adjudged, and taken to be citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, rights and privileges of natural born citizens.”February, 1786, "AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING MICHAEL WALSH.” in which it was declared that Michael Walsh “shall be deemed, adjudged, and taken to be a citizen of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, rights and privileges of a natural born citizen.”July, 1786,“AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING JONATHAN CURSON AND WILLIAM OLIVER” in which it was declared that Jonathan Curson and William Oliver “shall be deemed adjudged and taken to be free Citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, privileges and immunities of natural born citizens."March, 1787, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING WILLIAM MARTIN AND OTHERS.” in which it was declared that William Martin and Others,”shall be deemed, adjudged and taken to be free Citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, privileges and immunities of natural born subjects.”May, 1787, the Massachusetts legislature passed “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING EDWARD WYER AND OTHERS THEREIN NAMED.” in which it was declared that William Martin and Others,”shall be deemed, adjudged and taken, to be free Citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, privileges and immunities of natural born subjects.”October, 1787, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING BARTHOLOMY DE GREGOIRE, AND MARIA THERESA, HIS WIFE, AND THEIR CHILDREN.” in which it was declared that Bartholomy de Gregoire, and Maria Theresa, his wife, their children,” shall be deemed, adjudged and taken to be free Citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, rights and privileges of natural born citizens.”November, 1787, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING ALEXANDER MOORE, AND OTHERS, HEREIN NAMED.” in which it was declared that Alexander Moore and others,”shall be deemed, adjudged and taken to be free citizens of this Commonwealth, & entitled to all the privileges, liberties, and immunities of natural born subjects.”June, 1788, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING WILLIAM MENZIES, AND OTHERS, THEREIN NAMED.” in which it was declared that William Menzies and others “shall be deemed, adjudged and taken to be free citizens of this Commonwealth, and intitled to all the liberties, privileges & immunities of natural born subjects.”November, 1788, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING ELISHA BOURN, AND OTHERS, THEREIN NAMED.” in which it was declared that Elisha Bourn and others “shall be deemed, adjudged and taken to be free Citizens of this Commonwealth, & entitled to all the liberties, privileges & immunities of natural born Citizens.”February, 1789, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING JAMES HUYMAN, AND OTHERS, THEREIN NAMED.” in which it was declared that James Huyman and others “shall be deemed, adjudged and taken to be free Citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the Liberties, Privileges and Immunities of natural born subjects.”June, 1789,“AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING NATHANIEL SKINNER, AND OTHERS, THEREIN NAMED.” in which it was declared that Nathaniel Skinner and others "shall be deemed, adjudged and taken to be free citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, privileges and immunities of natural born subjects.”March, 1790, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING JOHN JARVIS, AND OTHERS, THEREIN NAMED” in which it was declared that John Jarvis and others, “shall be deemed adjudged and taken to be free citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, privileges and immunities of natural born subjects.”March, 1791, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING JOHN WHITE & OTHERS" in which it was declared that John White and others, “shall be deemed adjudged and taken, to be free citizens of this Commonwealth, and intitled to all the liberties, privileges, and immunities of natural born subjects.”</comment>

<comment>The problem stems from assuming that means the same thing as British common law, which makes someone a "natural born subject" to the King. None of those Acts did.They only made such persons subject to the State in which they lived.The notion of being subject to the State is used throughout US history, such as...In 1873, the US Atty Gen ruled the word “jurisdiction” under the Fourteenth Amendment to mean “the absolute and complete jurisdiction. Aliens, among whom are persons born here and naturalized abroad, dwelling or being in this country, are subject to the jurisdiction of the US but only to a limited extent. Political and military rights do not pertain to them.”The US Constitution requires "natural born citizen" to be President. Perhaps that terminology was chosen to avoid confusion stemming from the different meanings of "subject", to prevent the confusion now demonstrated by those who can't actually read the words in the Constitution and to ensure that ONLY one definition could be applied.There is only one definition of "natural born citizen"."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Always good to have the Whack Job perspective.  Thank you.No one agrees with you, but you are entitled to your opinion.</comment>

<comment>If you disagree with the actual, written definition of "natural born citizen", then your opinion is wrong.I choose to be correct about this."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>So this alleged "Law of Nations" supersedes US Statutes?  You whack jobs are usually opposed to international law.  Are you REALLY maintaining that something other than the United States determines US law?  If so, prepare for boarding.And where does this alleged law come from?You got NOTHING but pure lunacy.</comment>

<comment>The US Constitution requires a person be a "natural born citizen" of the United States to qualify for the Presidency. It is the law.Like all the other words in the Constitution, the definition is not in the Constitution. It's in the reference books, such as dictionaries, etc., used by the Founders.If you don't understand what "natural born citizen" actually means, then look it up in the reference book the Founders used."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>I have no more time to waste on idiots.</comment>

<comment>As the article above sea states "natural-born Citizen" is based on the English legal term "natural-born Subject".</comment>

<comment>Which cannot possibly be correct, since a "natural born subject" to the King means something entirely different from a "natural born citizen" of a nation.The American Revolution was fought to free Americans from being "subjects" and make them "citizens".The exact definition of "natural born citizen" was in the hands of the Framers when they wrote the Constitution:Original French: "Les naturels, ou indigenes, sont ceux qui sont nes dans le pays, de parens citoyens"Literal: "The natural, or indigenous, are those who are born in the country, of parents who are citizens"Official English Translation: "The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Explain the Massachusetts Acts of Naturalization.Here is a summary:February, 1785, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING NICHOLAS ROUSSELET AND GEORGE SMITH.” in which it was declared that Nicholas Rousselet and George Smith “shall be deemed, adjudged, and taken to be citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, rights and privileges of natural born citizens.”February, 1786, "AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING MICHAEL WALSH.” in which it was declared that Michael Walsh “shall be deemed, adjudged, and taken to be a citizen of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, rights and privileges of a natural born citizen.”July, 1786,“AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING JONATHAN CURSON AND WILLIAM OLIVER” in which it was declared that Jonathan Curson and William Oliver “shall be deemed adjudged and taken to be free Citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, privileges and immunities of natural born citizens."March, 1787, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING WILLIAM MARTIN AND OTHERS.” in which it was declared that William Martin and Others,”shall be deemed, adjudged and taken to be free Citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, privileges and immunities of natural born subjects.”May, 1787, the Massachusetts legislature passed “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING EDWARD WYER AND OTHERS THEREIN NAMED.” in which it was declared that William Martin and Others,”shall be deemed, adjudged and taken, to be free Citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, privileges and immunities of natural born subjects.”October, 1787, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING BARTHOLOMY DE GREGOIRE, AND MARIA THERESA, HIS WIFE, AND THEIR CHILDREN.” in which it was declared that Bartholomy de Gregoire, and Maria Theresa, his wife, their children,” shall be deemed, adjudged and taken to be free Citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, rights and privileges of natural born citizens.”November, 1787, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING ALEXANDER MOORE, AND OTHERS, HEREIN NAMED.” in which it was declared that Alexander Moore and others,”shall be deemed, adjudged and taken to be free citizens of this Commonwealth, & entitled to all the privileges, liberties, and immunities of natural born subjects.”June, 1788, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING WILLIAM MENZIES, AND OTHERS, THEREIN NAMED.” in which it was declared that William Menzies and others “shall be deemed, adjudged and taken to be free citizens of this Commonwealth, and intitled to all the liberties, privileges & immunities of natural born subjects.”November, 1788, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING ELISHA BOURN, AND OTHERS, THEREIN NAMED.” in which it was declared that Elisha Bourn and others “shall be deemed, adjudged and taken to be free Citizens of this Commonwealth, & entitled to all the liberties, privileges & immunities of natural born Citizens.”February, 1789, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING JAMES HUYMAN, AND OTHERS, THEREIN NAMED.” in which it was declared that James Huyman and others “shall be deemed, adjudged and taken to be free Citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the Liberties, Privileges and Immunities of natural born subjects.”June, 1789,“AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING NATHANIEL SKINNER, AND OTHERS, THEREIN NAMED.” in which it was declared that Nathaniel Skinner and others "shall be deemed, adjudged and taken to be free citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, privileges and immunities of natural born subjects.”March, 1790, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING JOHN JARVIS, AND OTHERS, THEREIN NAMED” in which it was declared that John Jarvis and others, “shall be deemed adjudged and taken to be free citizens of this Commonwealth, and entitled to all the liberties, privileges and immunities of natural born subjects.”March, 1791, “AN ACT FOR NATURALIZING JOHN WHITE & OTHERS" in which it was declared that John White and others, “shall be deemed adjudged and taken, to be free citizens of this Commonwealth, and intitled to all the liberties, privileges, and immunities of natural born subjects.”</comment>

<comment>Your misunderstanding stems from assuming that means the same thing as British common law, which makes someone a "natural born subject" to the King. None of those Acts did.They only made such persons subject to the State in which they lived.The notion of being subject to the State is used throughout US history, such as...In 1873, the US Atty Gen ruled the word “jurisdiction” under the Fourteenth Amendment to mean “the absolute and complete jurisdiction. Aliens, among whom are persons born here and naturalized abroad, dwelling or being in this country, are subject to the jurisdiction of the US but only to a limited extent. Political and military rights do not pertain to them.”The US Constitution requires "natural born citizen" to be President. Perhaps that terminology was chosen to avoid confusion stemming from the different meanings of "subject", to prevent the confusion now demonstrated by those who can't actually read the words in the Constitution and to ensure that ONLY one definition could be applied.There is only one definition of "natural born citizen"."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>You miss the significance of the acts and the plain English language.  Here I've summarized them:February, 1785, "natural born citizens.”February, 1786, "natural born citizen.”July, 1786, "natural born citizens."March, 1787, “natural born subjects.”May, 1787, "natural born subjects.”October, 1787, “natural born citizens.”November, 1787, “natural born subjects.”June, 1788, “natural born subjects.”November, 1788, “natural born Citizens.”February, 1789, “natural born subjects.”June, 1789, "natural born subjects.”March, 1790, “natural born subjects.”March, 1791, “natural born subjects.”See how sometimes the use the term natural born subject(s) and sometimes they used the term natural born citizen(s).  They use both terms in the same construction to the same effect.When the people of Massachusetts read the Constitution for the first time natural born Citizen meant the same to them as natural born subject.</comment>

<comment>If I get sent a bill for reading this, someone is going to have hell to pay.;-)</comment>

<comment>Worth noting: this article is written tongue-in-cheekly in the style of a legal memorandum, which is typically passed from a subordinate attorney to a senior one as part of a research assignment.  If done correctly, it could be incorporated into a later court brief.  So I presume the author is doing this to give it an added air of legitimacy.</comment>

<comment>Rest assured this particular author knows his stuff.  He writes this way because this is how such things are written.</comment>

<comment>Well, the author is dead wrong on this issue. Very poorly researched.English law defined who is a "natural born subject" to the King of England. The Revolution and War of 1812 were fought to free Americans from that.The actual definition of "natural born citizen" is found in the reference book, Law of Nations, that Congress used from 1775 on."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>A book that has no authority here.https://norredlaw.com/2015/04/...</comment>

<comment>The Constitution is the authority.Law of Nations provides the exact definition of the Constitutional requirement for President:"The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Further question for the readers: are your legal opinions on Cruz's eligibility driven by your desire/opposition to seeing him elected?  In other words: if you don't want Cruz to win, are you naturally predisposed to finding a legal rule which will prevent it?I remember back in 2000 when Bush won, and Bush-supporters were upholding the Electoral College system while Gore supporters were, of course, arguing that it was archaic and anti-democratic.  Given the tightness of the vote, I imagine that if Gore had won by virtue of the Electoral College, then the conservative/liberal opinions on the merits of the College would have reversed.</comment>

<comment>I'll never vote for Cruz.  I think he's probably eligible, although it's still not settled law.</comment>

<comment>Crus is not eligible. This the exact definition of "natural born citizen"."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsObama and Rubio are also not eligible, due to having a foreign Father at birth.</comment>

<comment>The problem with this quotation is that it is from the 1797 English edition of The Law of Nations.  It does not appear in prior English translations.  Nor does it appear (or its French equivalent) in the original French edition.The phrase "natural born citizen" appears in the constitution written in 1787.  While the idea that the delegates at the convention in Philadelphia meant this phrase to have a definition which would not appear until 10 years later is intriguing, I really don't think it works without time travel.This is not to say that I agree with Garner.  It's just to say that there is no certain definition of "natural born citizen", only ones which are more or less likely.</comment>

<comment>It's not really a problem, since the original French means the same thing. The Founders were well aware of the meaning and the later, official English translation. In the chapter explaining what a Citizen is, Vattel documented:Original French: "Les naturels, ou indigenes, sont ceux qui sont nes dans le pays, de parens citoyens"Literal: "The natural, or indigenous, are those who are born in the country, of parents who are citizens"Official English Translation: "The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>A word of advice, if you will:  in order to convince someone, you must start at a common place. Now, I am a little confused about where we start here.  If,as you seem to agree, the phrase “natural born citizen” does not appear in any English translation of The Law of Nations before 1797 and so was not available tothe Founding Fathers in 1787, we must start with the original French text.  If I understand correctly, there weretwo.  One was published in 1758 and a posthumous edition containing de Vattel’s changes was published in 1773.The text of the first French edition is, as you state:"Les naturels, ou indigenes, sont ceux qui sont nes dans le pays, de parens citoyens" Would you agree that the words “ naturels” and “indigenes” are plurals (since “Les” precedes them and “s” is attached to each) and aresubstantives/nouns since they are the subjects of the sentence? If you do not agree, what part of speech and what number are they?You state that the literal translation of this sentence is “The natural, or in digenous, [sic] are those who are born in the country, of parents who are citizens".  However, you translate the plural noun “naturels” as singular “natural”.  Likewise, you translate the plural noun “indigenes” as the adjective “indigenous”.  My copy of the OED lists “indigenous” as an adjective, not as a noun.  You will haveto excuse me but I have a little trouble with a “literal” translation where plurals become singular and nouns become adjectives. Do you know French or did you obtain this translation elsewhere?  If elsewhere, where did you find it?If, as you claim, “indigene” means “natural born citizen”, could you provide citations to some examples from18th century translations from French to English of “indigene” to “natural born citizen”?You claim that “The Founders were well aware of the meaning [of indigenes] . . .” You might want to take a look at “The Founding Fathers' knowledge of French“, Paul M. Spurlin, The French Review, Vol. 20, No. 2 (Dec., 1946),pp. 120-128. Nevertheless, could you quote some of the Founding Fathers who demonstrated their awareness that “indigene” meant “natural born citizen” (other than the Constitution) and where we might find those quotations?Finally, you claim there is an “official” translation of The Law of Nations.  I am unable to find an edition of The Law of Nations on www.worldcat.org which has been translatedby an office.  Could you provide a citation to this edition which shows the office or official who translated it?I have no doubt that you believe that de Vattel defined “natural born citizen”, that you believe this definitionto be the only one and you believe that settles the question.  Likely, there is nothing I could say thatwill convince you otherwise which is a good thing because that’s not my point.  If you wish to convince others ofyour claims, you are going to have to start at a common place and walk forward, not jump.  Merely asserting again and again that the word “indigenes” means “natural born citizens” based on your knowledge of French and an unidentified “official” translation proves it is simply anargument from authority.  Unfortunately, on the internet, no one knows if you’re a dog.</comment>

<comment>I'll reiterate. The exact definition of "natural born citizen" WAS available and well known to the Founders as well as educated Americans long before the Constitution was crafted."Law of Nations" was a standard textbook in American universities by 1780, almost a decade before the Constitution. The first English translation had been in 1760, over a quarter century before the Constitution.In the paragraph explaining the meaning and birthrights of Citizenship, Vattel clearly defines who are the "natural"  citizens of a nation by birth. Plural or singular, it means the same thing.Original French: "Les naturels, ou indigenes, sont ceux qui sont nes dans le pays, de parens citoyens"Literal: "The natural, or indigenous, are those who are born in the country, of parents who are citizens"Official English Translation: "The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsIn 1775 Congress received and used the French edition and, as Franklin said, relied upon them for crafting the new nation. Those who did speak French, the international language of the time, were perfectly capable of translating for those who did not. And the English translations were also available.The common place to begin is the actual written definition of a term. From that understanding, we can point at whomever claims it means something else and confirm that person is "wrong".</comment>

<comment>Why did the Founders use both term natural born subject and natural born citizen interchangeably?</comment>

<comment>They did not.They were very clear on the difference. For example, during the War of 1812, they required all officers on US ships to be "natural born citizens" of the United States, because "natural born subjects" to the King would have dual loyalties and would be hanged for treason against their sovereign if captured.The Constitution requires a "natural born citizen" of the United States. There is only one definition and we know they knew it."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Zephaniah Swift - US Congressman, Chief Justice of Connecticut Supreme Court."The children of aliens, born in this state, are considered as natural born subjects, and have the same rights with the rest of the citizens.” 1795 "A System of the Laws of the State of Connecticut: in Six Books.Owners of Zephaniah Swift's treatise included President Washington, James Madison, James Wilson,  James Iredell, Oliver Ellsworth, John AdamsWilliam Rawle - "Therefore every person born within the United States, its territories or districts, whether the parents are citizens or aliens, is a natural born citizen in the sense of the Constitution, and entitled to all the rights and privileges appertaining to that capacity.". 1825 "AView of the Constitution of the United States"William Rawle was a personal friend to Benjamin Franklin.  In the months before the Constitutional Convention, Rawle, Franklin and Thomas Paine, Benjamin Rush, James Wilson, Robert Morse and Gouverneur Morris founded in Philadelphia the "Society of Political Inquires".  The Society met twice a month at Franklin's house to discuss the nature of the political institutions.President Washington appointed Rawle as the first United States Attorney to Pennsylvania.</comment>

<comment>In 1873, the US Atty Gen ruled the word “jurisdiction” under the Fourteenth Amendment to mean “the absolute and complete jurisdiction. Aliens, among whom are persons born here and naturalized abroad, dwelling or being in this country, are subject to the jurisdiction of the US but only to a limited extent. Political and military rights do not pertain to them.”When Americans use the term "subject to the State or Nation", they don't mean the same thing as British common law which makes a person "subject to the King's will". There is no connection between American use of "subject" and that of the British.Perhaps foreseeing your confusion, the Founders used the term "natural born citizen" so that anyone who can actually read would know, for certain, what they meant:"The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>And in 1898 the Supreme Court ruled that "subject to the jurisdiction" meant anyone born in the US even if their parents were aliens.</comment>

<comment>All English editions of the Law of Nations prior to 1797 translate "Les naturels, or indigenes" as "natives, or indigenes".The first law school in the United States was founded by Jefferson at the college of William and Mary in 1780.  The text book used by the first law professor George Wythe was Blackstone's Commentaries.</comment>

<comment>"Law of Nations" was also a standard textbook in American universities by 1780. The Founders own legal documents rely on it heavily, including John Jay, who warned that only a natural born citizen should be President.Blackstone's Commentaries do not provide the definition of "natural born citizen". It is found in "Law of Nations".Our Congress received their French editions in 1775. Vattel's paragraph on the nature of a Citizen (not subject) contains the definition of "natural born citizen" that was later translated to English and is still in print today.Original French: "Les naturels, ou indigenes, sont ceux qui sont nes dans le pays, de parens citoyens"Literal: "The natural, or indigenous, are those who are born in the country, of parents who are citizens"Official English Translation: "The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>I can't stand Cruz, but do think he's eligible for the presidency due to his mother's citizenship. It's karmic justic that his birther trolling has come back to haunt him.The folks who are doing backflips over this issue are Cruz supporters who proclaimed that Obama wasn't a citizen despite being born IN AMERICA to an AMERICAN mother.  If Obama wasn't eligible, Cruz would be even less eligible under that logic.</comment>

<comment>It never was a question of whether Obama was a citizen, though some people made that assertion to try to confuse the issue. It is only a question of whether he meets the requirements to be a natural born citizen of the United States."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsObama's Father was not a US Citizen when he was born. Disqualified.Cruz's Father was not a US Citizen when he was born and he was born outside US jurisdiction. Disqualified.Rubio has the same problem with his Father. Disqualified.</comment>

<comment>I read a history of the 2000 election, (which was excellent, and sadly, I can't remember its name...). Anyhoo, the author interviewed Gore's top campaign managers, strategists and Gore himself. A few weeks out, they saw that the election was going to be tight, and game-planned a scenario that was the reverse of what actually happened - Gore winning the electoral vote, but losing the popular vote. Their plan was exactly what you imagine - they would defend the constitutionality and legitimacy of that outcome to the last.That said, the issues in the supreme court case Bush v Gore had nothing to do with the legitimacy of the Electoral College.</comment>

<comment>No, it really didn't.  The Electoral College is a matter of prudential design: "Would you rather have this type of government, or this one?"  It's morally neutral, but understandably, somebody who falls on the losing side of it is going to complain in favor of a system that would have spun the votes in their favor.</comment>

<comment>Absolutely. I also shudder to think what kind of campaigns we'd have if there was no electoral college. The path to the presidency for the later half of the 1950s onward would have been to campaign for suburban white voters, especially on the coasts. Yes, that group was always a major factor, but rural and urban voters could have been completely ignored. There is a wisdom to the EC.</comment>

<comment>So you're saying that Wyoming voters should count five times as much as California voters when it comes to the presidency.Be honest.</comment>

<comment>When you consider that there approximately 70 times as many Californians as Wyomingians (?) , that doesn't seem so unreasonable. As our friends in Europe are learning the very hard way, a federal system requires a slight shifting of power from stronger states to weaker ones in order to work.</comment>

<comment>That's an interesting response, but it does dodge the "1 person 1 vote" idea.It is interesting that there is a strong correlation between the states which are net importers of federal funds, and those which tend to favor Republicans/conservatives.This exists on a smaller scale in Washington State.  The lightly populated counties tend to be very conservative, and yet are net importers of state tax revenue.  I grew up in one of those counties, and their enmity towards Seattle is fascinating: they do like to bit the hand that feeds them.</comment>

<comment>I live in one of those counties right now. The Federal Government has so crushed private industry here, so crippled access to natural resources, that the county is terribly impoverished.They were forced into dependence on handouts by Government.They want the dependence to end and to get back on their own feet, so they vote Republican / conservative to try to remove the shackles.</comment>

<comment>Without knowing your county, I can't respond definitively.  My home county presently agitates about access to water, and water rights, and yet is eager  grow thirsty crops (apples, pears, cherries, asparagus, ...) in a desert, at the expense salmon, and hydropower, ...It's about 50 acres of Western rangeland per cow/calf unit in the American West, where an acre or two would suffice East of the Mississippi.  While I have some sympathy for the Western American cattle rancher, from both an economic and environmental point of view, I'll accept their demise.</comment>

<comment>If the argument is good his attitude shouldn't matter.</comment>

<comment>Regarding the notion that Bush won the 2000 election, ...I remember when I had my first beer.</comment>

<comment>Of course, Bush did win every recount Gore demanded.After all was said and done, the media companies paid for yet another recount, hoping to come up with a shocking headline that Gore actually won. Even their recount came up with a win for Bush.It was close. There were a lot of illegal votes, especially due to Gore's "motor voter" scheme, and a lot of military voters were disenfranchised on any technicality Gore's lawyers could come up with... Bush did win.</comment>

<comment>But there is no doubt at all that Gore won the popular vote, is there.  It wasn't close.  Bush won, 5 to 4, alas.And how'd that work out for us?  Not to mention Iraq and Afghanistan and Syria.</comment>

<comment>Yes, that's fair, Gore won the straight numbers. I suspect that would not be the case without massive election fraud.Remember, Gore also campaigned on the promise to send in the tanks to take down Saddam, to complete the objectives of Bill Clinton's 1998 Iraq Liberation Act. Our media just pretended to have amnesia when a Republican won the election, to agitate hate and help the Democrats politically.Afghanistan... that had to be done as well. It was the home base and training center for Al Qaeda, which was (and still is) attacking nations all over the world. They had been coddled and left alone during the Clinton years, which did not work out well for us or anyone else.Now we have Obama using our military force to help Islamists build an empire and conquer nations. Libya, tried to take Syria but Congress stopped him, Iraq, Egypt... that's going to hurt us a lot. But the Left will scream that "WE ARMED THEM!" to diffuse our moral justification to wipe them out later, when a Republican President pushes that direction. The usual blather, without admitting who actually did help their rise to power. Mr. Obama.</comment>

<comment>Less legal analysis and more Democrat talking points, please. Bring back Garrett Epps!</comment>

<comment>You do realize that Epps came to the same conclusion, don't you?</comment>

<comment>And I flipped a coin and it came up heads (Cruz wins). So what? My comment was about analysis, not results. Epps is a hack.</comment>

<comment>Analysis you clearly did not read</comment>

<comment>I didn't feel like I had to read all of Twilight to decide it was garbage, either.</comment>

<comment>Right so you are no troubled by ignorance and feel free to criticize things you have not read. Even though his conclusion was exactly the same you've decided that his "analysis"--which you did not read--was flawed, even though it led to the same conclusion. I'll keep the extent and level of your willful ignorance in mind</comment>

<comment>I am an attorney and can recognize poor arguments when I see them.Epps is a hack. It doesn't matter whether the conclusions he reaches are right or wrong. It's like showing your work on a math test.</comment>

<comment>Legal arguments aside, common sense would lead to no other outcome.</comment>

<comment>But the actual, written definition of "natural born citizen" would affirm that a foreign born child OR a child born to a non-Citizen parent is not a natural born citizen of the United States."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsThat's from the reference book the Founders used when writing the Constitution.</comment>

<comment>Bottom line of this article is this: the answer to the question is not 100% clear, the law is convoluted and complex, and it could potentially be adjudicated.  Cruz would likely win, but the citizenship question is potentially unclear.  And that's enough to give credence to Trump's claims that the question is unsettled and the Democrats could use it against Cruz.  </comment>

<comment>at the same time, democrats suing cruz could serve as a boost to his electoral stock should he be nominated and sued, as he could very easily be considered a victim in the eyes of the american people, especially if the Supreme Court steps in immediately and rules in his favor.</comment>

<comment>Ted Cruz is always the victim. He's a princess, and princesses always fall down and cry anytime there's trouble. He's the reverse-Batman.</comment>

<comment>I don't care if he's eligible or not, but I do care that he's a power-hungry and shape-shifting phony that was born in Canada to a Cuban radical. And he's literally married to Wall Street.</comment>

<comment>But the issue is extremely easy to resolve.One need only read the definition of "natural born citizen" in the same reference book the Founders used when creating our nation."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsCruz, Obama and Rubio are all disqualified.</comment>

<comment>I appreciate Garner trying to throw something together on short notice, but if you want to read the work of someone who has researched this issue inside and out, see Catholic University Professor Sarah Duggin's work on it (link below).  She puts a lot more emphasis on the framer's intent than does Garner, and the common law view of "natural born citizen" that prevailed in 1789.   From the evidence compiled by Duggin, I think the originalists on the current SCOTUS would have a tough time finding Cruz eligible for the presidency.http://scholarship.law.edu/cgi...</comment>

<comment>I suspect the Originalists on the current SCOTUS will come to whatever conclusion they want.</comment>

<comment>It is remarkable how often the framers intent seems to line up with Scalia's politics isn't it.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>That's basically an accurate depiction of conservative thinking on the matter which follows the basic form:Given: The Founders were relatively conservative compared to the modern American consensus.Given: Antonin Scalia's personal prejudices are relatively conservative compared to the modern American consensus,Therefore proven: Antonin Scalia's personal prejudices and the will of the Founders are equivalent.  QED.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>I never said "all," I said "equivalent."  It's really a question of authority; we say that the Founders have authority, and that maybe Scalia should, because both can be called "conservative," but we don't really know what the founders would self-identify as, the actual issues they faced were very different.Many of these people held certain positions that we identify as conservative today, but then again many of these same people would have been drummed out of the Conservative movement for their support of slavery -- slavery and white supremacy, I am informed, are very un-conservative values.Attribution of pre-industrial politics to modern ideologies and movements relies on a lot of unfalsifiable conjecture.  Saying George Washington or John Adams were "conservatives" in a recognizably modern sense, or that, hypothetically, they would agree with this or that SCOTUS opinion on something like abortion rights or gay marriage, is Man-In-The-High-Castle level speculation.</comment>

<comment>I disagree with you, as I made clear before. But I did so inappropriately rudely. Sorry for that. Have a good night or day.</comment>

<comment>Gah, spare me.</comment>

<comment>First off, Legal Writing in Plain English is a classic and Bryan Garner has done yeoman's work in improving the clarity of an entire profession.Second, I think it also should've been disclosed that Professor Garner has co-authored two books with Justice Scalia.  Both good books, but it still reads on his capacity for objectivity.Third, this is a useful addition, but as Professor Garner stated, he drafted this memo over the course of a day.  It is fantastically drafted, but it avoids venturing outside the lines into the historical record and secondary sources.  It's a safe bet that Professor Sarah Duggin - cited in Tribe's op-ed - invested considerably more than one day in drafting her 2005 article.Finally, this is a fun exercise but nothing more.  The answer is that there is no answer; any legal challenge would regrettably turn on politics, not scholarship.  Overall, Tribe's instinct seems correct: originalist = ineligible; sane people = eligible.</comment>

<comment>And the Garner-Scalia collaboration "Reading Law" has been slammed by many, and not just from the left.  The book led the invaluable libertarian-ish 7th Circuit Justice and legal intellectual Richard Posner to write the instantly-legendary article "The Incoherence of Antonin Scalia."On a more positive note, Garner is also the longtime editor of Black's Law Dictionary, which is the legal dictionary in the US.</comment>

<comment>There is an answer. It is wonderfully easy to find, in the same reference book the Founders used when creating our nation. We know, for a fact, they had the exact definition of "natural born citizen" in their hands when they made it a requirement to be President."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Mr. Garner wrote: "The 1790 federal statute cannot affect the meaning of the constitutional words in Article II, which took effect in 1789. In fact, the enactment of the 1790 statute suggests that the common-law meaning was explicitly being changed.Under a well-accepted canon of construction, constitutional or statutory words and phrases with an accepted common-law meaning are presumed to bear their common-law meaning—unless explicitly redefined."No one can argue with that general statement, but we don't have a common law meaning that is so well-defined in this question. Terms such as "bankruptcy" and "patent" are used in the Constitution, and we are not bound by the terms as they were used by England at that time.Giving Congress the authority to issue patents and establish rules of bankruptcy is to tell Congress that the United States will have patents and allow bankruptcy, and to define those using statutory laws. The same is true of the "natural born citizen" phrasing - Congress is to ensure that the naturalization laws ensure that those running for office have a deep loyalty based on their rearing and parentage that may not be present in those who are naturalized as a teenager. But splitting hairs based on which parent was the citizen at the time of birth doesn't seem to address that issue in the modern world.As Mr. Garner no doubt knows, the "natural born citizen" language was added almost absentmindedly in the middle of the constitutional convention after prodded by a letter from John Jay, "Permit me to hint, whether it would not be wise & seasonable to provide a a strong check to the admission of Foreigners into the administration of our national Government; and to declare expressly that the Command in chief of the american army shall not be given to, nor devolve on, any but a natural born Citizen."With regard to the gender-based naturalization laws, it would seem that the focus should be whether the child is born to parents that are loyal to the country, as that is the focus of John Jay's letter and the obvious goal of the law. Modern medicine has eliminated any rational basis to base a child's rights based on the ability to establish his "real" parentage.Those quibbles aside, I'm pleased that Mr. Garner concludes with the reality that the modern jurisprudence would reject a gender-based analysis and allow Cruz his time in the White House, if he is able to garner the electoral votes.(I wrote a whole article on the Ted Cruz eligibility question, focused mostly on the Birther arguments at https://norredlaw.com/2015/04/...</comment>

<comment>Finally, someone reasonable! If the Constitution (or other legislation) has a term undefined, and then gives someone regulatory or legislative power over that area, then they also get to define the term.This is especially true since "natural born" has two senses: natural can mean "conferred by birth" (contrasted with legal action), or "pertaining to the time or place of birth" in Dr. Johnson's dictionary.  https://books.google.com/books... Someone should look at the use of "natural born subject" or state of citizenship under the Articles of Confederation and the states under it. Those would presumably be more useful than the English cases, as the common law would be changed by state constitution and statute.One example is the Act of May 1779, c. 55 about who would be deemed a Virginia citizen: "all infants wheresoever born, whose father, if living, or otherwise, whose mother was, a citizen at the time of their birth....shall be deemed citizens of this commonwealth..."</comment>

<comment>We have the exact meaning of "natural born citizen" in our hands and we know for a fact the Founders did too."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsThe 1790 act created an extension, allowing that those born beyond sea to citizen parents would be "considered as" natural born citizens, because they are not. This proves to us that class of persons is not encompassed by the actual definition of "natural born citizen" as used in the Constitution.The 1790 act was fully repealed in 1795 and has had no legal effect since. Its only use to us is to show a class of persons the founders knew were NOT natural born citizens.The definition clarifies why.</comment>

<comment>Baloney. The Constitution uses many words to indicate a concept that is fleshed out by Congress, e.g., bankruptcy and patent. Congress defines how these concepts are worked out.The point of the discussion of the 1790 Act is to show that the Founders demonstrated that Congress could make changes to the definition and handle the higher standard of loyalty discussed by John Jay's letter by passing laws, and it doesn't take an amendment.With that as your basis, the 14th Amendment disallows people from making a decision based on sex of a parent. We have federal law that shows how a person must be naturalized in order to become a citizen. If someone is a citizen, and he didn't need to be naturalized, then he is a natural born citizen. Ted Cruz was never naturalized, because he has always been a citizen.Vattel's definition does not control here. I've written an entire article just for people like you, who think that they have some sort of secret higher understanding of the law: https://norredlaw.com/2015/04/...No charge.</comment>

<comment>The Constitution permits Congress to do many things, including creating rules for naturalization. It does not permit them to alter the qualifications for the Presidency. That requires a Constitutional Amendment.The point of the 1790 Act is to show the Founders knew persons born outside US jurisdiction were not natural born citizens, so they temporarily allowed such persons to be "considered as" such. That never altered the definition of "natural born citizen". And the temporary allowance was repealed in 1795.The 14th Amendment has no relevance. To be born a citizen does not automatically make one a natural born citizen. But to be a natural born citizen DOES automatically make one a citizen at birth. You got them reversed.Ted Cruz naturalized just a few years ago  when he renounced his Canadian citizenship.Vattel's definition is the ONLY definition and we know, for a fact, the Founders were familiar with it for over a decade before they wrote the Constitution."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Wow, you read my entire article that completely refutes your position in mere seconds. Amazing that you need not learn anything further.I have spent significant time putting together every reference to Vattel that occurred during the Constitutional Convention, and really made an attempt to show you are correct. But alas, it can't be done.But I have had these conversations before. Let's just assume you are too brilliant...so brilliant you don't want to use your real name, or read anything that might challenge your understanding. We'll part here, and you can declare victory, safely ensconced in your own reality. Cheers.</comment>

<comment>I dug through your article and found a load of confused BS. You confuse Vattel's comments on "natural born citizen" with his recognition of citizen status based on other nation's laws. You fail to comprehend that "natural born citizen" requirement for our Presidency was included to ensure no other nation's citizenship laws could bring foreign influence to that office.You sure wrote a lot but you failed to make a coherent case.There is only one definition of "natural born citizen" and the Founders had a good reason to impose it as a Presidential requirement. It's the reason John Jay warned of. So, a President MUST meet the conditions of the definition..."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>It is easy to demonstrate the Founders knew exactly what "natural born citizen" means when they made it a requirement for the Presidency, based on John Jay's warning about the risk of merely being "born a citizen" bringing foreign influence to that office.They acquired several copies of "Law of Nations" for use by Congress in 1775, with Ben Franklin making it clear that they relied on it for crafting the new nation.By 1780, it was a standard textbook in American universities, therefore its content was well known to Americans.By 1787, the first American printing confirmed the importance of this reference book to the American nation - coinciding with the use of it for crafting the US Constitution.It is the ONLY source of the definition of "natural born citizen"."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>You don't have to assume anything.Just read the definition of natural born citizen, then you can see why the Founders used it to resolve John Jay's concerns about foreign influence in the Presidency."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Not sure why the various statutes passed by Congress are relevant. The question is the meaning of Constitutional language. Congress can't affect that meaning by passing a statute. Why did the author devote so much of his memo to that?</comment>

<comment>So what about Dred Scott, which ruled that no black person, free or enslaved, could ever be a US citizen? If Dred Scott had not been reversed by the Civil War, then Obama could never have become President. Or was Dred Scott unconstitutional in the first place?The tablets Moses received on Mt. SInai were carved in stone, but precious little since has ever been. (And really you have to wonder if Moses was on the level.)</comment>

<comment>Dred Scott wasn't reversed by the Civil War. It was reversed by the postwar 14th Amendment which is specifically discussed by the author in his memo.</comment>

<comment>And the exact definition of "natural born citizen" is so clearly spelled out it is impossible to get it wrong. No statute has ever altered it and none can."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Bryan, I am curious about why your analysis looks to the two 17th century British acts of Parliament for the interpretation the constitutional term "natural born citizen." Your conclusion seems to depend logically on their influence, since you cite them as part of, and indicative of, the common-law meaning, but I am not sure why they should be considered as part of the "common law."British legal theory at the time of the Founders, as captured in Blackstone's commentaries, seems to have maintained a distinction between the established rules and holdings of traditional British common law and the alterations made by acts of Parliament--including specifically in the commentaries on citizenship, where Blackstone states that citizenship under the common law was strictly by place of birth, and not by descent (except for the special cases of the King and his "embassadors" and foreign invaders). Yet you seem to equate British common law with British common law as modified by Parliament, without addressing whether the distinction between British common law and British statute should be preserved in US constitutional interpretation.The US Supreme Court has specifically sanctioned the use of British common law as a source for interpreting the Constitution, but I am not aware that acts of Parliament have ever been held to carry similar weight. Further, the case you cite for bringing British statutes into US common law is not really relevant, since it is a case interpreting and applying the law of Georgia, not federal law. (And incorporation of British law, common and statutory, into state common law is a very different matter than interpreting the US Constitution.) Still further, James Kent's commentaries, which you also cite as supporting incorporation of the British statutes into common law or into US law, gives this definition of common law:"The common law includes those principles, usages, and rules of action, applicable to the government and security of person and property, which do not rest for their authority upon any express and positive declaration of the will of the legislature."(LECTURE 21, Of Reports of Judicial Decisions, second paragraph). This shows that the distinction of statutory vs. common law was well-maintained and understood in the early U.S.Based on Blackstone and Kent, it would seem that extraterritorial citizenship by descent was understood to be a statutory addition, and *not* a part of the British common law at the time of the Founders.  Further, given Supreme Court guidance to look to look to British common law as a source for interpretation of the US Constitution, a "natural born citizen" would seem to be someone born within the territorial jurisdiction (excepting children of ambassadors and invaders).Is there any better basis than you have cited to support reliance on the two British statutes in interpreting the "natural born citizen" clause?</comment>

<comment>Yes, this would all be pertinent if Congress had not passed any law on the matter since 1789.  But Federal statutes prevail over case law (aka common law), and statutes enacted later prevail over statutes enacted earlier.Thus, INA 301 applies:INA: ACT 301 - NATIONALS AND CITIZENS OF THE UNITED STATES AT BIRTH [8 U.S.C. 1401]http://www.uscis.gov/iframe/il...This is the more persuasive case.  But, as we know from Bush v. Gore, the Constitution really means whatever 5 out of 9 Supreme Court Justices decide.</comment>

<comment>Bush vs Gore was correct.  You can't change the law after the fact.</comment>

<comment>But to be nationals or citizens at birth is not what the Constitution requires to be eligible for the Presidency. It requires "natural born citizen" status. The exact definition is easy to find in the reference book used by the Founders when they were creating our nation."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>"Bernie Sanders has had enough of #BigMoney in politics and so have we. #FeelTheBern" MoveON for Bernie"When it comes to the Republican debate, I feel like the real winner is me because I didn't watch it." Angie Aker (Occupy Democrats)"There are 18,600,000 vacant homes in the United States. Thats enough for every homeless person to have six." Occupy Wall St.Keep updated - MoveON ... Occupy Democrats ... Occupy Wall St"Bernie Sanders and his supporters are bending the arc of history toward justice. Theirs is an insurgency, a possibility, and a dream that we proudly endorse." - The Nation Magazine</comment>

<comment>"Bernie Sanders and his supporters are bending the arc of history toward justice. Theirs is an insurgency, a possibility, and a dream that we proudly endorse." - The Nation Magazine=================The Nation Magazine's idea of justice is using the force of government to take someones property.</comment>

<comment>Sadly, there is no clause excluding one from the office based on extreme douchiness.</comment>

<comment>Harder question: Is Ted Cruz a Sleestack?</comment>

<comment>"Before its appearance in the U.S. Constitution, the phrase natural-born citizenwas virtually unknown in Anglo-American law"Bryan, I'm sure you read John Jay's letter to Washington that used the phrase.  Did the First Chief Justice of The United States pick a phrase that would allow a dual citizen to be Commander in Chief of The US Armed Forces?It seems counterintuitive to the purpose of the letter.</comment>

<comment>"Natural born" was known in law, but only with respect to "natural born subject."  The Jay letter takes the natural born and sticks it before Citizen.</comment>

<comment>So the author is incorrect when he labels "natural born citizen" as a phrase?What was Jay, in his letter, trying to accomplish with either your version or the author's version of the phrase? </comment>

<comment>Natural born subject and natural born citizen are pretty much the same, except that the former would be used in a royal realm where loyalty would be to the king or queen, while the latter would be used in a nation of citizens.  Ergo, Jay was presumably just updating the phrase for use in the fledgling US republic.</comment>

<comment>That may be, but it doesn't answer the question.  What was Jay trying to accomplish with his letter to Washington and why did he pick that phrase? </comment>

<comment>John Jay was reacting to Alexander Hamilton's proposal to the Constitutional Convention:"No person shall be eligible to the office of President of the United States unless he be now a Citizen of one of the States, or hereafter be born a Citizen of the United States." June 18, 1787Jay realized this would allow an American, born to a foreign parent, to bring foreign allegiance into the Presidency. So, he warned they should go with the much more strict requirement of a natural born citizen."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsThis would ensure nobody born with foreign allegiance could become President.The status of "natural born citizen" was also required for all officers and 3/4 of sailors on US ships in the War of 1812, to ensure dual allegiance would not affect the loyalties of the Navy and would reduce the number of Americans who would be hanged for treason against their King when captured by the British.</comment>

<comment>They are not the same.Natural Born Subject to the King of England - our Revolution and War of 1812 were fought to free Americans from that status.Natural Born Citizen of the Nation - our Constitution requires this status to be President (or Vice President)"The citizens are the members of the civil society; bound to this society by certain duties, and subject to its authority, they equally participate in its advantages. The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsThat's the exact definition of the term used in our Constitution.</comment>

<comment>I don't think you and I disagree on this.  Natural born subject is a "subject" of a monarchy (in this case the King of England), and natural born citizen is one who lives in a nation (e.g. the US), and owes his allegiance to that nation's society, which will ordinarily include an elected government.</comment>

<comment>Okay, you know the difference.That's why too many people keep trying to use the cropped term "natural born" from English common law, which is a terrible mistake. That law makes someone a "natural born subject" to the king - because if a King holds dominion over a subject then the King also holds dominion over the children of that subject.There is a clear definition of the term "natural born citizen", which means something completely different, and is the actual requirement to be President of our country."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsThat's what the Founders required, to ensure there would be no "foreign influence" on the child by birth to a foreign parent or under foreign jurisdiction.</comment>

<comment>It's also a lie.Law of Nations, published in 1758, provides the exact definition of "natural born citizen". It was first published in the international language, French, then in other languages including English and German. The Founders received several copies in the original French in 1775, for use in constructing our nation's founding documents.Original French: "Les naturels, ou indigenes, sont ceux qui sont nes dans le pays, de parens citoyens"Literal: "The natural, or indigenous, are those who are born in the country, of parents who are citizens"Official English Translation: "The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsBy 1780, Law of Nations was a common textbook in American universities and was used by governments around the world. The first American printing was in 1787, the same year the Constitution was crafted.The exact definition of "natural born citizen" was VERY well known by the time the Constitution was crafted.</comment>

<comment>A more interesting question is whether trump's skin colour is natural born.</comment>

<comment>This would have been an interesting question......back when we were a nation of laws.</comment>

<comment>Personally, I don't care - but Republicans HAVE to care. Republican politicians including its top leaders and top presidential candidates, pundits and conservative intellectuals ALL engaged in birther-trolling Barak Obama. And he was born INSIDE the United States. This is now a question about Republican integrity. Their very honesty and ethics are on trial right now. Do Republicans just say $#!T for the sake of daily political spin and don't actually mean a word of anything coming out of their mouths? Or is there integrity and consistency there beneath the race-baiting and wink-nod gestures to the bigiots at the back of the GOP's big tent?Republicans better take this seriously and give serious answer to what they decide. They opened up Pandora's Box and now they have to face their own f@#king music.</comment>

<comment>Pandora's Box is a music box?  Who knew?</comment>

<comment>The carnival barker admitted he started this because cruz's polling numbers were edging up in Iowa. It is race-baiting for their base.</comment>

<comment>Ted Cruz played the birther-flute himself so don't cry for him, Argentina.Cruz should have known this would come up and he should have had a better response planned than $#!T-barfing on New Yorkers or assuming his fetal-position, "I'm a victim of the media" tortoise shell defense that he does reflexively. Ted Cruz is a very inexperienced politician without any scar tissue from tough races. He's a novice and it shows. He doesn't know how to play this game.</comment>

<comment>When did he play the birther-flute?  Milbank had an article suggesting that, but without any fact cited.</comment>

<comment>Actually, I think your original suggestion was right, presuming I understood it correctly.  To push back effectively, he would have to admit what douches the republicans were for levelling the claims at Obama.</comment>

<comment>Well, I just assumed Ted Cruz wasn't capable of such a classy and admirable thing as saying birtherism is what everyone knows it is - not so subtle racism. It would be an odd pivot after every other crappy thing he's done and said but its never too late to start being a decent man. Maybe he'll surprise us.His failures as a politician are a separate issue from the Republicans decent into this particular madness. He should have known how to handle this because god knows he should have known it was coming and been better prepared for it. Politics is about exposing weakness and exploiting it. Any fool knows that.</comment>

<comment>I'm surprised he didn't call him "Rafael" last night. It's coming though. That dog whistle will have to be blown in due course.</comment>

<comment>Ummm... I'm quite certain that honesty and ethics and politics in general, don't really go together. People seem to think they do, but observation and analysis pretty clearly indicate that they don't.Which isn't to say that ethics and honesty don't play any role at all, merely that they aren't the deciding factors very often.</comment>

<comment>Which brings up one last question. If Mrs Cruz appeared on a Canadian voter's list in 1974, that means that she must have been a Canadian citizen at that time. When did she become a citizen? If it was before Cruz was born surely that renders his eligibility moot.</comment>

<comment>Unlikely that she could have naturalized before he was born given Canada's 5 year residency requirement at the time.  Also - the US doesn't consider US citizenship relinquished simply due to naturalization.  The person needs to be asked and if the answer is no they still consider that person to be a US citizen.</comment>

<comment>But Ted Cruz is disqualified by birth to a foreign Father and birth outside US jurisdiction.The actual definition of "natural born citizen" is easy to find and clarifies the issue..."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>I would argue your research is lacking:At the close of the Convention, Hamilton conveyed a paper to James Madison he said delineated the Constitution that he wished had been proposed by the Convention; he had stated its principles during the deliberations. Max Farrand wrote that it "...was not submitted to the Convention and has no further value than attaches to the personal opinions of Hamilton." Article IX, section 1 of Hamilton's draft constitution provided: "No person shall be eligible to the office of President of the United States unless he be now a Citizen of one of the States, or hereafter be born a Citizen of the United States."On July 25, 1787, John Jay wrote to George Washington, presiding officer of the Convention:"Permit me to hint, whether it would not be wise and seasonable to provide a strong check to the admission of Foreigners into the administration of our national Government, and to declare expressly that the Command in chief of the American army shall not be given to, nor devolve on, any but a natural born Citizen."While the Committee on Detail originally proposed that the President must be merely a citizen as well as a resident for 21 years, the Committee of Eleven changed "citizen" to "natural born citizen" without recorded explanation after receiving Jay's letter. The Convention accepted the change without further recorded debate.</comment>

<comment>While the document was not presented to the Convention, Hamilton gave an hours-long speech on June 18, 1787 to the Convention in which he detailed the full 10 section plan. That included the Presidential requirement "hereafter be born a citizen", which spurred John Jay to warn Washington of the danger it posed.Jay's argument made such good sense the Founders rejected "born a citizen" in favor of the more strict requirements for "natural born citizen", defined in the reference book they had been using since 1775..."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Hoist on his own petard.  The birther nonsense Cruz spewed about Obama is now coming back to bite him in the nads.  If he's really as smart as he imagines himself to be, he should have seen this coming.</comment>

<comment>The GOPers do seem to fall into self-created hypocrisy traps more often than the Dems do, and they're almost always over silly a/o tangential issues that have little or nothing to do with anything of substance. The current birther nonsense- railing about "homos" ruining America and then getting arrested for soliciting sex in an airport Men's room - talking about the need to preserve the American family then scurrying off to the hospital to serve your dying wife with divorce papers - look up Freudian Projection in an on-line dictionary and you should see these guys pictures.</comment>

<comment>The United States Supreme Court has never conclusively ruled on this issue and probably won't anytime soon, unless it somehow reaches a point where it can't be avoided.</comment>

<comment>Thank you for a much more researched article.  However, the author's conclusion doesn't follow from his prior statements.  The long, long history of equating natural-born with native-born is well documented even in recent SCOTUS cases, such as Rogers v Bellei in 1971.A suggestion: could we look for precedent not in prior SCOTUS cases about natural-born but instead cases about naturalization?  That's been mentioned a lot by SCOTUS, and in such cases (again, see the 1971 case), Cruz fits the SCOTUS definitin of naturalized.If he's naturalized, he cannot also be natural-born.</comment>

<comment>He is only natural born if he meets the exact definition of "natural born citizen". It's easy to find in the reference book the Founders used:"The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>The complexity of this matter convinces me that it is NOT an albatross I want my candidate sporting in the general election.But a bigger question remains and it is one that nobody seems to address: WHEN DID MAMA CRUZ RENOUNCE HER US CITIZENSHIP...BEFORE OR AFTER TED'S BIRTH!This seems so relevent yet no one EVER talks about it.</comment>

<comment>Ted claims she never became a Canadian citizen.  Dad might have said otherwise.However, at the time Canada had a 5 year residence requirement for naturalization and she gave birth to Ted after maybe 3 years in Canada.  Also - naturalization in another country doesn't necessarily mean relinquishing US citizenship.</comment>

<comment>It's not actually relevant. Ted Cruz is disqualified by having a foreign Father when he was born and by birth outside US jurisdiction. Either of those means he does not meet the conditions to be a natural born citizen of the United States."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Thank you so much for this article .As it now stands he cannot legaly be president untill the supreme court makes a ruling .</comment>

<comment>"No person except a natural born Citizen, or a Citizen of the United States, at the time of the Adoption of this Constitution, shall be eligible to the Office of President; neither shall any Person be eligible to that Office who shall not have attained to the Age of thirty-five Years, and been fourteen Years a Resident within the United States." -- Constitution, Article 2, Section 1, clause 5Ted Cruz is ineligible to run for President of the United States. He was born in Canada, of parents who were Canadian citizens at the time of his birth. Cruz's mother claims to have been born in Delaware. The State of Delaware claims not to have any records of her. (The authenticity of the Birth Certificate provided by the Cruz campaign is now in dispute.) But even if genuine, it makes Cruz a US citizen, but not "Natural Born."Ted Cruz's supporters try to get around "Natural Born" by claiming it simply means any US citizen, an opinion even echoed at Wikipedia!But if any US citizen could be President, then the qualifier "Natural Born" would not be needed (and is not present in the Constitutional citizenship requirements for Representatives and Senators). Clearly, to the Founding Fathers, "Natural Born" had a specific and obvious meaning, applied exclusively to the Presidency!The Founding Fathers did not need to define what "Natural Born" meant inside the Constitution as it had been defined in existing legal theory in works such as "The Law of Nations" by Emerich de Vattel, published in 1758 and relied on heavily by the framers of the Constitution. "Natural Born" was already legally defined when the Constitution was written as "born inside the nation."The inclusion of the "Natural Born" requirement for the Presidency was proposed at the Constitutional Convention by Chief Justice John Kay, who wrote, "Permit me to hint, whether it would not be wise and seasonable to provide a strong check to the admission of Foreigners into the administration of our national Government and to declare expressly that the Command in Chief of the American army shall not be given to, nor devolve on, any but a natural born Citizen..."The intention is clear that the Presidency not be open to anyone not born within the United States.In addition, there are no less than four United States Supreme Court Decisions that reaffirm that "Natural Born" means "Born inside the nation."The Venus, 12 U.S. 8 Cranch 253 253 (1814)Shanks v. Dupont, 28 U.S. 3 Pet. 242 242 (1830)Minor v. Happersett , 88 U.S. 162 (1875)United States v. Wong Kim Ark, 169 U.S. 649 (1898)There has never been a United States Supreme Court Decision that ruled "Natural Born" as having any other meaning than "born inside the country."All of Cruz's supporters, including the corporate media, are demonstrating either an ignorance of the US Constitution, or an utter disregard for it. This tells us that were Cruz to become President, he would continue the long and tragic tradition of recent Presidents to ignore the Constitution to the detriment of the people.The Constitution is the original contract with America. It is the rules by which We The People allow the government to act as caretaker of our National Sovereignty. If a politician does not wish to work within the restrictions and rules of the Constitution, the honorable thing to do is resign and find useful employment. If Ted Cruz's supporters wish to live in a nation not protected by the Constitution they are free to move elsewhere.But under the rules this nation operates on, Ted Cruz is not eligible to be President of the United States.</comment>

<comment>Unlikely that Eleanor Darragh was a Canadian citizen at the time of his birth.  The generally accepted timeline is that she entered Canada in 1967 and gave birth to Ted in Dec 1970.  At the time Canada had a 5 year residence requirement for naturalization.  Even if she did naturalize, that wouldn't automatically relinquish her US citizenship.As for the other stuff you cite, a lot of it I don't buy, but some has merit.  Citing de Vattel is iffy at best - especially since the words that many cite read differently depending on translation from the original French.</comment>

<comment>The words are slightly different in French but the meaning of the phrase is the same:Original French: "Les naturels, ou indigenes, sont ceux qui sont nes dans le pays, de parens citoyens"Literal: "The natural, or indigenous, are those who are born in the country, of parents who are citizens"Official English Translation: "The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsThe official English translation, still in use today, did not alter the meaning. And the Founders were very familiar with this when they wrote the Constitution, having used "Law of Nations" as a reference since 1775.</comment>

<comment>The photo for this article suggests that the apt question about Sen. Cruz's candidacy is NOT whether he's Canadian but whether he harbors a Napoleonic complex: that hand slipped inside his jacket looks suspicious . . . .</comment>

<comment>It also implies that the candidate either does not know the law or lied about its meaning. Either he is incompetent or he is untrustworthy .</comment>

<comment>So I guess this is one circumstance in which Cruz would be willing to set aside his ridiculous "originalist" judicial philosophy of Constitutional interpretation. Maybe the Constitution is a living document after all!</comment>

<comment>Why would relying on the 14th Amendment Equal Protection clause constitute a philosophy which isn't "originalist?"</comment>

<comment>It's a good memo.  Cruz might be eligible but only via 14th amendment equal protection.  That's a question of law for the Court to decide.I think Trump is right, Cruz is vulnerable to a legit legal action to determine this issue.  I hope this law suit doesnt happen bc it is going to relate strongly to our broken immigration system. And we have soooo much rancor on this issue its basically not going to be resolved with reason its going to be resolved by arguments of passion.Imo, we need to end birth right citizenship.  It no longer makes any sense.  This Presidental issue is a good example of why it doesn't.Qualifications for President and for citizenship have to based on more than where you were born.  It seems like natural born might come to mean "born to at least on US citizen parent." Certainly, there has to be a nexus or a naturalization - based on where you were born and who your parents were or some other well thought out nexus.  Citizenship can't be available to the world at large as long as you enter the country without limitation or without consideration of whether the entry was legal.Isn't that a huge part of what's broken?If Cruz can be eligible for President, by viture of his parents and "naturalization" then people who are simply born here to illegal immigrants should not be citizens, wo more or simply based on place of birth alone.</comment>

<comment>The 14th Amendment never touched on the status of "natural born citizen". It only dealt with Citizen status. The Constitution makes a clear distinction between those two.The Citizens, by birth or naturalization, all share the same rights and privileges except eligibility for the Presidency.Only natural born citizens can be President.The exact definition is easy to find in the reference book used by the Founders:"The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>I'm just sitting here with a big bucket of popcorn with schadenfreude topping enjoying the show!</comment>

<comment>Long Story Short: the natural born phrase is vague at best so it is defined by the current law.</comment>

<comment>This 'by current law' thing seems to be floating around; what is it's source?  It isn't wrong exactly, but current law includes, for instance, old Supreme Court cases (provided they have not been overturned).  So Supreme Court cases from the 19th century that distinguish between naturalized citizens--including those born abroad to citizen parents--and natural citizens are still good law.  I.e., part of 'current law.'But I suspect that is not what the people talking about 'current law' mean.  Those using the phrase seem to mean, 'of course he is eligible, no question, move along.'</comment>

<comment>Of course, if the sentiments of the Founders were all that counted, then President Obama could not have been President, and could not even have been a citizen of the United States, even though he was born in Hawaii, because he is of African descent. SCOTUS ruled in 1857 that no person of African descent could ever be a citizen of the US.</comment>

<comment>That was changed with the 14th Amendment</comment>

<comment>As long as you're not investigated by the feds, you'll should be good to go.</comment>

<comment>Hey, what's this guy's agenda?  Seems to be to take the fun out of frivolous politicking.  He should be banned.</comment>

<comment>Hot off the wire....http://trailblazersblog.dallasnews.co...</comment>

<comment>So if Cruz survives both the eligibility scrutiny and the politics and emerges as the next POTUS, and thenwe come to find out he wasn't eligible and shouldn't have been elected in the first place, what happens? Personally I have no idea but I expect it would be fun, which is good because, you know, I like to watch.(Not to mention a few months of full employment for journalists with legal backgrounds...)</comment>

<comment>Then presumably he would removed from office and the VP would become President.</comment>

<comment>If he is found eligible it will just mean another clown rolling out of the car until the conventionIneligible  sends the parties to court and the real infighting begins, either way the GOP loses</comment>

<comment>I'd admire this story a lot more if it had been published eight years ago.The claim that an "originalist" interpretation requires Cruz's disqualification is disingenuous. The originalist interpretation of the 14th amendment is that it means what people thought it meant when they passed it. It's hard to argue that this meant anything other than giving rights through maternal as well as paternal inheritance.If the Supreme Court said anything else in the early '60s -- and they didn't -- they were just plain wrong. The Court reverses its earlier decisions all the time, and quite correctly too.</comment>

<comment>Memorandum: Is Hillary Clinton Eligible for Leavenworth Prison?</comment>

<comment>Cruz could beat Killary.</comment>

<comment>Rand Paul has no birther baggage.</comment>

<comment>Very interesting, but I find it puzzling that the writer puts so much onto the 1790 statute that was formally repealed and replaced only five years later to explilcitly delete reference to "natural born".  That significant rewording was made within a decade of the ratification of the Constitution and the Congress obviously would have had the Constitutional significance of "natural born" in mind when they changed the words so that blood citizenship acquired on foreign soild was not "natural born" any more.  The normal convention of interpretation is that the legislature is deemed to have "turned its mind" to explicit changes to wording.(Also pretty clear the pre-Revolutionary Royal definitions would apply to the Dominion of Canada the same as the colonial USA, not clear how that could work in the Cruz case.)</comment>

<comment>Good point, but not relevant. Congress can't change the meaning of the Constitution by statute.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>I agree 100%. </comment>

<comment>First, I will start that I am a US Military Vet and so is my father.Well my Grandfather was born in Crystal City Texas and in 1929. My Grandmother was born in Mexico. My father was born in Mexico in 1948, but US Goverment made him get his US Citizenship even when he had my Grandfather's Birthcertificate as proof. So, I feel that if the US Goverment refused to recognize my father as a Natural Born US Citizen neither should Mr. Cruz.</comment>

<comment>You're saying laws can never change?</comment>

<comment>I don't this particular law has changed. I just think it's been kept sort of hush hush. Only the wealthy get to use it.First I have to say that I am undecided who to vote for.Now, I have a question for you.If we allow Mr. Cruz to become president, do we have to allow Queen Noor's (Jordan/Islamic Country) children become president of US if they choose to run? Or any other child born abroad from an American parent that is born and raised under Islamic Law?</comment>

<comment>But this particular law has indeed changed, and it's not hush-hush. The law is published for anyone who cares to read it.As for your question, I don't know what the status of Queen Noor's children are, but if they are citizens from birth, then yes, they can run for President.I don't particularly care for Islam, but nowhere is there some rule against Muslims running for office in the US. It's up to people to vote for them or not.</comment>

<comment>What a politically correct answer, on you part.I might not be politically correct with my answer, but as for me I have never heard of anybody being classified as a Natural Born US Citizen. When they are born abroad and not on US soil/Territory, US Embassy, or military base untill now.As for allowing someone under the same citizenship issues that Mr. Cruz has, I would never vote for them. Especially if they are from an Islamic country and raised by Islamic laws. Just as you indirectly directed me to look up the citizenship laws. I advise that you look into what Islam and the Quran say about dealing with infidels. Which by the way refer to me and you, in the Quran. </comment>

<comment>That's because the term "natural born citizen" is no longer used. There are lots of legal terms from the 18th century that are no longer in use today.And I know all about Islam but it's still a fact that the Constitution imposes no religious requirements on office holders.</comment>

<comment>I'm not talking about religious requirments. I'm talking about Mr. Cruz opening up a loophole that can be used against the United States by someone that has a anti-American agenda. Just look what Obama has done, he is disarming us with his gun laws. Here is an example. I know several Vietnam, Iraq, and Afgan vets that are under Obama's new gun laws they won't be able to legally own a hand gun or rifle. These guys are law abidng citizen, but because of their  disibility status they have now been striped of their 2nd amenment rights. To me that's just a hidden agenda, from someone that has Islamic ties.   </comment>

<comment>I don't know what you mean by opening up a loophole. It's a long-established law. You can't blame people for following the law.As for your "Obama new gun laws," you're wrong. No such thing. http://www.rense.com/general78...</comment>

<comment>Ok, well if you can't see the loophole I guess that part of conversation is over.What I am talking about is my fellow vets that are receiving Social Security that have payees because of their disibility are now going to be reported as mental defective by Social Security Administration."The White House released a fact-sheet Jan. 4 which previews the executive gun control Obama will unveil Tuesday and one aspect of the new controls is the inclusion of “information from the Social Security Administration in the background check system about beneficiaries who are prohibited from possessing a firearm.”On July 18 Breitbart News reported on Obama’s push to ban gun-possession for Social Security beneficiaries who are believed incapable of handling their own finances.At that same time, the Los Angeles Times reported that a ban was being put together “outside of public view,” so all the details were not known. But the Times did  know that the ban would cover those who are unable to manage their own affairs for a multitude of reasons–from “subnormal intelligence or mental illness” to “incompetency,” an unspecified “condition,” or “disease.”The ban pertaining to Social Security beneficiaries is now tucked into the “mental health” aspects of Obama’s executive gun control.According to the White House executive order preview:Current law prohibits individuals from buying a gun if, because of a mental health issue, they are either a danger to themselves or others or are unable to manage their own affairs. The Social Security Administration (SSA) has indicated that it will begin the rulemaking process to ensure that appropriate information in its records is reported to NICS. The reporting that SSA, in consultation with the Department of Justice, is expected to require will cover appropriate records of the approximately 75,000 people each year who have a documented mental health issue, receive disability benefits, and are unable to manage those benefits because of their mental impairment, or who have been found by a state or federal court to be legally incompetent. The rulemaking will also provide a mechanism for people to seek relief from the federal prohibition on possessing a firearm for reasons related to mental health.Social Security beneficiaries who meet the criteria of “mental impairment” as demonstrated by a partial inability to handle their own benefits will be added to the National Instant Criminal Background System, therefore they will no longer be able to purchase a gun."</comment>

<comment>That meme has been going around for a while, and they just keep upping the dates to make it seem current. It's not current. It's a hoax.http://www.politifact.com/trut...And anyway, you think people too far gone mentally to even handle their own money should have guns?</comment>

<comment>Well the vets I know, that fall under this new law I trust with out a doubt. Just because someone has to handle their bank account don't mean they are a danger to anyone. They are law abiding citizens and Obama is infringing on their second amendment rights.  I hope you never go though any issue that may get you a mental health diagnosis and you end up losing your rights. Like these vets have. </comment>

<comment>The point is that the meme is wrong. Look into it. It's not what you've been told.</comment>

<comment>From the White House:Live Updates: What the President is Doing to Keep Guns Out of the Wrong Hands"Increase mental health treatment and reporting to the background check systemThe Administration is proposing a new $500 million investment to increase access to mental health care.The Social Security Administration has indicated that it will begin the rulemaking process to include information in the background check system about beneficiaries who are prohibited from possessing a firearm for mental health reasons.The Department of Health and Human Services is finalizing a rule to remove unnecessary legal barriers preventing States from reporting relevant information about people prohibited from possessing a gun for specific mental health reasons."Well I don't know where you are getting your info, but I guess we will have to agree to disagree.I hope you are right, but I think you are wrong. Even the NRA is reporting the same information.</comment>

<comment>Our citizenship laws have to be defined and exact not allow any loopholes. Like the loophole Mr. Cruz is trying to use. </comment>

<comment>There's a little more to it.The Founders were spending years abroad as Ambassadors and did not want to disqualify their own children from the Presidency. So, they created a temporary extension to eligibility by saying that the children born abroad to US Citizens would be "considered as" natural born citizens, because they are not.This temporary extension was repealed just five years later, reducing those people to mere "citizen" by birth, which means they don't qualify for the Presidency.Today, all candidates must actually BE natural born citizens to qualify:"The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsObama, Cruz and Rubio are not.</comment>

<comment>"The Constitution is what the judges say it is" - Charles Evans HughesTherefore the only institution able to answer the question is the Supreme Court.</comment>

<comment>No, the Supreme Court can be overruled by Congress, the body that actually crafts legislation and amends the Constitution. If the Supreme Court can't understand the Constitution or legislation well enough to make the correct ruling, then Congress has the power to alter it to force the court into the correct understanding.It would be hard to get the "natural born citizen" issue wrong unless someone is trying VERY hard to do so, like the author of this article. It is spelled out so clearly, no such confusion is reasonable."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Can anyone here tell me what this sentence means:  "This might mean that the decision cannot be said to hold that such a statute doesn’t violate equal protection." ?</comment>

<comment>Just to see if I can do it:'One view of the holding of decision X is that statute Y does not violateequal protection.  But the factor I am discussing may mean that view of the holding is incorrect.'</comment>

<comment>Thank you</comment>

<comment>The opinions of Sir Francis Bacon should not be taken into account when deciding US Law and Constitutionality.</comment>

<comment>Well done, Professor Garner. We'll done.</comment>

<comment>Can't stand Cruz, but come on.</comment>

<comment>Does common law control something like this at all?  The binary distinction the Constitution makes is whether Cruz was a citizen at birth, or whether he had to be made a citizen.I'd say that's a matter within the authority of Congress, and as such the question of 'natural born citizen' ought to be decided by the statute law in place when and where the candidate was born.  The Constitution did not constitutionalize the whole common and statute law of England in 1789 to the extent that the legislature is not allowed to change it.  Congress can make natural born citizens out of people who wouldn't have been in 1789, and that counts for Constitutional purposes.</comment>

<comment>For me the issue is this: Congress made the rule that people born abroad to U.S. citizens are citizens themselves.  Congress could change that rule (for instance, to require the child to reside in the U.S. for 5 years before being naturalized--in fact I think there have been such rules at various times).  Therefore Cruz was, in your words, 'made a citizen'--made a citizen by act of Congress.  That he was made a citizen at birth doesn't change that fact.  Under Supreme Court precedent he falls into the category of naturalized citizen.It may seem like a technicality, the difference between being born a citizen and being made a citizen at birth.  But technicalities are what the law is all about.  If you are 'technically' not a natural-born citizen, then you aren't a natural-born citizen.</comment>

<comment>There is no legal difference between being made a citizen by an act of Congress and being made a citizen by the Constitution. Moreover, it's incorrect to call Cruz "naturalized" just because his citizenship was established before his birth by an act of Congress. To become naturalized is to actually go through a legal process that, at the end, declares you a citizen. That did not happen with Cruz. He was born, and he was automatically a citizen. He didn't have to go file papers with immigration.</comment>

<comment>As I have explained to you before, the Supreme Court disagrees with you.  To paraphrase what a judge told me once, between you and the Supreme Court, the Supreme Court usually wins.</comment>

<comment>Well, if we look around, we can see that's clearly not true. Do you think the Supreme Court would allow its rulings to be ignored?</comment>

<comment>haha, how do we see it is not true exactly?Do you think the Supreme Court runs around like the Beastie Boys in Sabotage, busting people?  No, they wait for lawsuits to be brought to them.  Remains to be seen if that will happen here.</comment>

<comment>But you said the Supreme Court had already ruled on the matter. Ignoring a Supreme Court ruling would surely provoke a constitutional crisis.</comment>

<comment>The Supreme Court has ruled that persons who are born to U.S. citizens abroad are naturalized citizens.  That's where they disagree with you.It would seem to follow that such persons are therefore not natural-born citizens. The Supreme Court has never ruled on that precise question, however.But yes, a Cruz candidacy might provoke, if not a Constitutional crisis, at the least some very interesting litigation.</comment>

<comment>I believe you are taking a sentence from an opinion, but that sentence did not constitute a "ruling." I'd further have to see the claim in the context of the case.Here's why I'm skeptical. To be "naturalized" is a process of formally applying for citizenship and having that citizenship granted. There has to be paperwork that shows that you applied and that the US Government decided you'd make a good citizen, so they said ok and stamped your papers.But when you're born abroad to American parents, you don't have to fill out any application for citizenship. You're a citizen already, from the moment you're a viable fetus. And even though you're not in the US, you and your parents are still "under the jurisdiction" of the US. If your parents engage in activity that is illegal in the US, they can be prosecuted for it even though they didn't engage in the activity in the US.The claim that Americans born abroad are naturalized citizens because they are citizens only thanks to an act of congress and not because the constitution says so doesn't make sense either. If that were true, then before the 14th Amendment was enacted, everybody was naturalized since the only law regarding citizenship were acts of congress.</comment>

<comment>"To be "naturalized" is a process of formally applying for citizenship and having that citizenship granted.""Naturalized citizen" is a legal category.  The Supreme Court has defined what people fall into that category, and it just doesn't match what you are saying, no matter how many times you say it.</comment>

<comment>This what you said, but you can't seem to back it up.When did the Supreme Court rule that people born abroad to US citizens are themselves only naturalized citizens?</comment>

<comment>"Every person born in the United States, and subject to the jurisdiction thereof, becomes at once a citizen of the United States, and needs no naturalization.  A person born out of the jurisdiction of the United States can only become a citizen by being naturalized,  either by treaty, as in the case of the annexation of foreign territory, or by authority of congress, exercised either by declaring certain classes of persons to be citizens,  as in the enactments conferring citizenship upon foreign-born children of citizens..."United States v. Wong Kim Ark, 169 U.S. 649, 702-703 (1898)</comment>

<comment>The problem with using that case is that you're taking a sentence that's part of the legal discussion but not part of the ruling. The case was about whether someone born in the US was a US citizen even if their parents were not US citizens. The Supreme Court said such a person was indeed a citizen under the 14th Amendment. The case had nothing to do with people not born in the US.The most that you can conclude is that the Justice who wrote that would have agreed that only US-born citizens could be president. But that was back in 1898, and nobody ever brought the question before the court.</comment>

<comment>1) Recall that I got into this conversation in response to Epp's article claiming there was just no question that Cruz is eligible.  I think there is a valid question here.  I don't claim to know the answer to that question--nor does Garner claim to know for certain, though he thinks Cruz is likely eligible.  No one will know for sure until the Supreme Court rules on it.2) I agree that Wong Kim is not squarely on point.  The language I cite, it's true, is not the holding of the case.  That doesn't mean it is mere dicta.  Courts often sum up the settled law on the way to reaching their decisions.  I see the language I cite as a summing up of settled law before moving onto more uncertain ground.  You see it as dicta.  This is the sort of thing lawyers write long briefs about.  I have not read the entire Wong case and I don't intend to--I am not going to read 80 pages of legal prose to win an argument in the comments section.  (Wong has been cited for exactly the proposition I cite it for--that persons born to citizens abroad are naturalized--in Miler v. Albright, but in a concurrence so that won't convince you either.)3) Given that there is no case directly on point we are left guessing what the Supreme Court will do.  I think the language in Wong and other cases supports the idea that Cruz is naturalized.  But courts do what they want; if the Supreme Court went the other way it would not be the first time a court has gone against an outcome strongly suggested by prior decisions.4) To sum up, it's an open question.  There's strong evidence that Cruz is naturalized, but whether that settles the matter of his eligibility, we won't know until and unless the Supreme Court rules.  Neither you, nor I, nor Epps know for sure.  Anyone running around saying this is an obviously settled question--on either side--is wrong.</comment>

<comment>Ok, fair enough. You make good points, and I think we can agree it's an open question, which is why it has led to so much debate.</comment>

<comment>No, there's nothing in the Wong Kim Ark case asserting that being US-born qualifies a person to be President. It even asserts that does not make the person a "natural born citizen" of the United States. That status, as the Judge affirms, depends also upon the citizenship of the Father, the only parent who could pass down citizenship at the time.It clarified that Wong Kim Ark, if born in the US, is a Citizen, but not a natural born citizen. He was not born to a Citizen Father.The actual definition of natural born citizen also reaffirms this."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Sorry, but that's incorrect. The Court ruled that, under the 14th Amendment, it did not matter who someone's parents were. If the person was born in the US, that person was a citizen. Period. The Court did not rule that Wong Kim Ark was a citizen but not a natural born citizen.As for the Law of Nations, that was a book on political philosophy written by a French man. Oh, I'm sure the Founders read it. They read lots of things. I'm a little skeptical that they considered themselves bound by the book, and there's just no evidence that the Founders gave citizenship much of a thought. They kicked the can down to the Congress.</comment>

<comment>>> If the person was born in the US, that person was a citizen.Yes, that was the court's ruling. And it recognized that the 'natural born citizen', a different status, was born of a citizen parent (the Father, in those days), as the definition of natural born citizen requires.Here's the relevant text:Wong Kim Ark: "The child of an alien, if born in the country, is as much a citizen as the natural born child of a citizen, and by operation of the same principle."Notice, there are two different classes of citizen recognized by that statement.The ruling was also a travesty, getting the intent of the 14th Amendment wrong. It was not intended to give citizenship to the children of illegal aliens.</comment>

<comment>I think "is as much a citizen as" means that there's no difference between the citizenship of a US-born child of an alien and a US-born child of a citizen. It says nothing about the citizenship of foreign-born children of US citizens.That's why "originalism" is an intellectually bankrupt pursuit.Why should we consider intent in the first place? The Founders and subsequent lawmakers were educated, literate, and eloquent people. They were perfectly capable of telling us what they meant without us having to crawl into their heads or become armchair psychologists.Had they really, really, really wanted to limit the presidency to US citizens born in the US to US citizens, they would have been perfectly able to express that. Mexico's lawmakers were able to. The Mexican Constitution says in no uncertain terms that the President must be a citizen "by birth" whose parents are also Mexican citizens by birth.</comment>

<comment>>> I think "is as much a citizen as" means that there's no difference between the citizenship of a US-born child of an alien and a US-born child of a citizen.That's fair. They are both full Citizens. The stated distinction is that only the child of the citizen is a natural-born citizen. That's the one who can become President.>> Had they really, really, really wanted to limit the presidency to US citizens born in the US to US citizens, they would have been perfectly able to express that.They did, so precisely that you can't get it wrong, by requiring the President to be a natural born citizen of the United States."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations"The first and governing maxim in the interpretation of a statute is to discover the meaning of those who made it." --James Wilson, Of the Study of Law in the United States, 1790</comment>

<comment>Correct, there is no difference in "citizenship" between the person born a citizen and the natural born citizen. All natural born citizens, born on US soil of citizen parents, are also citizens. But not all persons born a citizen are natural born citizens, as even the Judge in the Wong Kim Ark case acknowledged. There is a difference.We must consider original intent because the law means and can only mean what it was intended to mean. If 'educated, literate' people later simply decide it means something else, without actually changing the law, they are intellectually bankrupt and have no understanding of how laws actually work.Our Founders used "natural born citizen" in the Constitution, which was perfectly understood throughout the US and all those other nations using their own copies of "Law of Nations". The definition is so perfectly clear that only the intellectually bankrupt will go seeking other possible meanings that were unknown to the people who made this a requirement to be President:"The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsClearly, any OTHER assumed meaning would allow the "foreign influence" into the Presidency of which John Jay warned.</comment>

<comment>The actual definition of "naturalize" is to renounce all foreign citizenship and allegiance and become solely an American Citizen.The definition of "natural born citizen" ensures a person is born with no foreign allegiance, therefore they are solely and entirely a US Citizen at birth:"The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsTed Cruz renounced his Canadian Citizenship just a few years ago. He naturalized... almost. There may still be Cuban allegiance passed down by his Father.</comment>

<comment>Actually, citizen at birth is not the issue. The exact definition of "natural born citizen" is easily found in the reference book the Framers used when writing the Constitution:"The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsEnglish common law made someone a "natural born subject" to the King, which is not what our Constitution requires.</comment>

<comment>From what I've read, this attorney's opinion seems correct -- it "seems highly likely" that the Supreme Court would hold that someone like Cruz is eligible to be president. Here's the problem though: would you buy a house if your lawyer opined that it "seems highly likely" you'll obtain clear title?Trump is right on this one. </comment>

<comment>And the Supreme Court would commit a crime against the Constitution if it ruled in any way other than what the actual, written definition of "natural born citizen" says:"The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsCruz is double-disqualified by his non-Citizen Father and birth under foreign jurisdiction.</comment>

<comment>Cruz was born in Canada. His father is a communist Cuban and his mother renounced her US citizenship before he was born.</comment>

<comment>Cruz's father is an evangelical minister; I doubt if he ever was a communist.  As for your assertion that Cruz's mother renounced her US citizenship, please provide a credible source for that... I don't believe that, sounds like pure bovine excrement.</comment>

<comment>They had only lived in Canada for 3 years before Rafael was born with the minimum being 5 for citizenship so she was still an American.</comment>

<comment>Over at the WashPost, there is an editorial calling for the removal of the natural-born requirement.  I think it would be better to clarify the term -- either through the courts or legislation -- rather than scrap the requirement.Take, for example, Rupert Murdoch.  Here's a guy who became a US citizen for the sole purpose of skirting restrictions on the ownership of TV stations by foreigners.  At various times, his News Corp. has told the IRS that it was foreign-owned -- to save on taxes -- while telling the FCC that it was true-blue American, since it couldn’t own all its stations if it wasn't.Without the natural-born requirement, someone like Murdoch would be eligible to serve as president.  The thought turns my stomach.</comment>

<comment>"Clarifying" the term "through legislation" would clarify nothing. Congress can't legislate the meaning of the Constitution.</comment>

<comment>All that is necessary is to open the reference book used by the Framers when they wrote the Constitution. The definition is right there, in black and white. It can't be clarified any more than what it says:"The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>On a related note, I've long suspected that Ted Cruz in his heart of hearts doesn't believe that he is eligible. Its a bit of super amateur analysis, but he seems way too obsessed with this idealized PURE version of America. Like, all of his efforts to be the most perfect example of an American are all to compensate for his insecurity that he isn't actually a "real" American. It's like the stereotype of the closeted guy who goes way too far all the time to show how manly and straight he is, when meanwhile deep down he knows the truth.</comment>

<comment>I don't know why he would think he might not be a "real" American. There is no doubt he is an American citizen and is eligible for every office in the land...except maybe President, for which he must be a "natural born" American citizen.</comment>

<comment>If he is at all familiar with the history of the Constitution, he knows he is not eligible. There is only one definition of "natural born citizen" and it has been known throughout our nation's history, until very recently when Obama was allowed to illegally take office."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Whether Cruz is a U.S. citizen or not, what is important is what Trump said.  Did you hear what he said?  He said Cruz needs a legal declaratory judgement.  Do you know what it means?  He said basically that if Cruz does win anything like the nomination or the Presidency, Trump, being the loser, will turn "full birther" and dog Cruz with every legal suit possible to insert every doubt and take it all the way up the legal system to make sure anything Cruz does, will be totally deep sixed.  Remember Trump will be 70 next year and this is his last shot at being President.  Trump will have plenty of time and money to make so much mischief for Cruz that Cruz winning actually means Cruz loses.  Cruz is so screwed!  With Trump, we are learning that it doesn't matter what the U.S. law says, what matters is what Trump says.  Get used to it.</comment>

<comment>TransparencyDonald Trump, the presumptive Republican presidential nominee; is considering applications for VEEP, and several cabinet positions, which are in the CinC 'Line-of-Succession'.  The applicants are encouraged to submit their Article II bona fides, under oath, in a court of law; and to promptly and publicly respond to litigation requests for discovery.  It would be a good idea to provide Mr. Trump with a record copy.These job applications presently appear to be in order: Carson, Santorum, Rand Paul, Huckabee, Scott Brown, Kaisch, JEB, Palin, Christie, Fiorina, Romney ... The Cruz, Rubio and Jindal job application files appear to have some material deficiencies.  LOL</comment>

<comment>The what?</comment>

<comment>Incredible analysis.</comment>

<comment>Incredible, literally meaning unbelievable. As in, not believable.</comment>

<comment>A pity the author did not refer to Vattel's  "Law of Nations" and quite peculiar as well since it was the standard reference for our founding fathers.When born abroad, the father conveys his citizenship to the child. Not the mother.When in service to the nation and a child is born abroad the child's nationality is the same as the parents. As was the case with. McCain.Now if Cruz's mother was an American citizen, that is accepted now. The question is that Cruz' mother voted in Canadian elections and this seems to suggest that she became a Canadian citizen and then Cruz was born making both parents Canadian citizens and thus the child a Canadian citizen as well.Once back in America she restored her citizenship. Was Cruz naturalized upon entry into the US? Was he officially naturalized?Whether or not the whole story is verifiable since this Canadian voting may be something other than true given the sad state of politics and journalism.But it does matter and if it doesn't, I think we would be better off electing Putin rather than the slim pickings offered us by our rulers.If the author writes a follow up, consult Vattel's "Law of Nations."</comment>

<comment>It doesn't really matter. Second-guessing the Founders is mostly an intellectual exercise. What matters is the law today.Look, the clearest indication you can get that you're barking up an empty tree is that the establishment has not even taken notice. You have few lawyers rushing to write stuff because it gets them air time, and you have the usual people in the internet sniping at each other.Where is the Congressional hearing about this? And Ted Cruz has been in Washington for a while now. You think nobody hates him enough to go digging? Please... Washington is a mosh pit of backstabbers. The fact that nobody has gone after him over this shows that there's nothing to go after.</comment>

<comment>The establishment are gangsters that make NAZIS look like amateurs.</comment>

<comment>The Constitution is part of the law today.  Interpreting the Constitution involves looking at Supreme Court cases as well as the intent of the framers, including looking at the common law of the time to understand what the terms they used meant to them.This is all...pretty standard stuff.  What part are you having trouble with?</comment>

<comment>The law today requires a person be a "natural born citizen" of the United States to be President or Vice President.The exact definition is found in the reference book used by the Founders, which is still in print today as it is essential to interpreting the Constitution (latest Supreme Court case was in 2012).That definition is:"The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsWhich is still the requirement today.</comment>

<comment>The author probably didn't refer to Vattel because the United States has its own well-developed laws on nationality, and nobody needs to consult a book of commentary that was only ever useful for denying citizenship to people based on race or servitude.</comment>

<comment>You sir, are several measures shy of a half wit.I defer to your sophomoric attempt at collegial humor and offer my best wishes on you forthcoming SATs.</comment>

<comment>Maybe you should try a "sophomoric attempt at collegial humor."  You're sure not getting the law right.</comment>

<comment>Elian Gonzales.Vattel's "Law of Nations"Laws of a nation are not the same as laws between nations.But what does Congress know of law?</comment>

<comment>O...kay, was that the attempt at humor?</comment>

<comment>HA HA HA HA HA HA HA HA HA HA HA HA HA HA HA!</comment>

<comment>"Senator Ted Cruz Is Eligible to Be President"http://www.nationalreview.com/...January 15, 2016JOHN C. EASTMAN - Henry Salvatori Professor of Law & Community Service, Former Dean at the Chapman University Fowler School of Law, and the Founding Director of the Claremont Institute’s Center for Constitutional Jurisprudence.quote"The definition of “natural-born citizen” in the Constitution has never been adjudicated by the Supreme Court, and I suppose that — at least for some judicial supremacists — until the High Court speaks, all is up for grabs. But for most constitutional law scholars who have considered the subject, the issue is relatively straightforward and long settled. The requirement in Article II that one be a “natural-born citizen” in order to be eligible for the presidency simply means that one be a citizen from birth, rather than subsequently becoming a citizen by laternaturalization.""Moreover, this was the understanding of the clause given by the very first Congress in a bill passed in 1790 and signed into law by President George Washington: “Children of citizens of the United States, that may be born beyond the sea, or out of the limits of the United States, shall be considered as natural-born citizens.” Under that widespread and long-standing interpretation, Senator Cruz is clearly a natural-born citizen and therefore eligible for the presidency. His mother was a U.S. Citizen (born in Delaware) as well as a long-time resident of the United States, who happened to be living in Canada when Ted was born while her husband was temporarily employed there."unquote</comment>

<comment>It was adjudicated in Dred Scott (1857) which determined that being born on US territory did not necessarily make one a cititzen. That was reversed after the Civil War.</comment>

<comment>Well, not quite. The Dred Scott decision held that black people, enslaved or free, born here or not, could not become US citizens. The case was not about people in general, but black people specifically.</comment>

<comment>The Atlantic"Memorandum: Is Ted Cruz Eligible for the Presidency?"http://www.theatlantic.com/pol...quote"The conventional thought is that there are three paths to citizenship: (1) birth within a territory (traditionally known as jus soli); (2) naturalization; and (3) blood rights: the status of being the child of a citizen, even if born outside the territory (traditionally known as jus sanguinis). The U.S. Constitution appears to contemplate only the first two categories—not the third, which was created in 1790 by federal statute, one year after the Constitution was ratified."""In 1790, the First Congress enacted a statute establishing blood rights for foreign-born children of U.S. citizens and referring to them expressly as “natural-born citizens.” Here’s what it said: “[T]he children of citizens of the United States, that may be born beyond sea, or out of the limits of the United States, shall be considered as natural born citizens: Provided, That the right of citizenship shall not descend to persons whose fathers have never been resident in the United States.” The title of the statute was “An Act to establish an uniform Rule of Naturalization.” It was repealed shortly afterward. Five years later, a federal statute was enacted to the same effect, but it omitted the phrase natural-born citizen: “[T]he children of citizens of the United States, born out of the limits and jurisdiction of the United States, shall be considered as citizens of the United States: Provided, That the right of citizenship shall not descend to persons, whose fathers have never been resident in the United States.”The statutory basis for the rule has ebbed and flowed through the years. In 1802, Congress enacted a statute to providing that “the children of persons who now are, or have been citizens of the United States, shall, though born out of the limits and jurisdiction of the United States, be considered as citizens of the United States.” In 1855, Congress changed the benefit from “children of persons” to “children of fathers”: “All children heretofore born or hereafter born out of the limits and jurisdiction of the United States, whose fathers were or may be at the time of their birth citizens thereof, are declared to be citizens of the United States.” Not until 1934 did Congress relinquish the patriarchal preference that disallowed mother-citizens from conferring blood rights—making clear that this was a reversal of prior law. As late as 1961, the U.S. Supreme Court upheld this differential treatment by denying citizenship to the son of a father-alien (the mother was a citizen).""Nineteenth-century American authorities tended to overlook blood rights and instead to focus on the first two categories: either birth within the territory or naturalization. The Fourteenth Amendment, which took effect in 1868, states: “All persons born or naturalized in the United States, and subject to the jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of the United States.”16 There the dichotomy is between born in the United States and naturalized. This Birthright Citizenship Clause clarifies that anyone born on U.S. soil is a citizen. It doesn’t affect the immigration statute that extended citizenship to the child of a nonresident citizen. Indeed, the U.S. Supreme Court has said that blood-rights citizenship is “not covered by the Fourteenth Amendment.”"If that’s true, and if Article II covers the same types of citizenship as the Fourteenth Amendment, then there’s a gap in the Constitution: blood-rights citizenship isn’t covered. The question is whether natural-born citizen (Article II) is the same as person born in the United States (Amend. 14).""Even before that post–Civil War constitutional amendment, it was common to attribute the same meaning to natural-born as Blackstone did. In 1828, James Kent wrote his Commentaries on American Law, in which he equated natural-born citizen with native citizen. He closely paraphrased the applicable constitutional words from Article II and then gave the rationale for the provision. Note his use ofnative citizen: “As the President is required to be a native citizen of the United States, ambitious foreigners cannot intrigue for the office, and the qualification of birth cuts off ... inducements from abroad to corruption, negotiation, and war.”"Just five years later (1833), in his celebrated constitutional commentary, Justice Joseph Story contrasted natural-born citizen with naturalized citizen—the latter being one born a citizen of a different country who later becomes a U.S. citizen. This contrast, of course, later appeared also in Section 1 of the Fourteenth Amendment. Again, blood rights are ignored.""So the question boils down to whether blood rights are encompassed in the common-law meaning of natural-born citizen. The 1790 federal statute cannot affect the meaning of the constitutional words in Article II, which took effect in 1789. In fact, the enactment of the 1790 statute suggests that the common-law meaning was explicitly being changed.""Under a well-accepted canon of construction, constitutional or statutory words and phrases with an accepted common-law meaning are presumed to bear their common-law meaning—unless explicitly redefined."(English Law, Common Law, interpeted, translated into Constitutional law)"The question boils down to whether blood rights confer natural-born status or merely cause “automatic naturalization.” Note the broad words of the statutory declaration that became part of American common law: “are hereby declared to be natural born Subjects ... to all Intents, Constructions, and Purposes whatsoever.” That language might seem determinative: natural-born includes someone who becomes a citizen by blood rights. That was the state of the law in 1789.""But the automatic-naturalization argument has some force. It is not uncommon in legal literature to see references to a foreign-born child of a citizen as “naturalized at birth.” The words naturalize and naturalization are common in this context. Thus Sir Francis Bacon argued in 1607: “By the statute of Edw. III which, if you believe Hussey, is but a declaration of the common law, all children born in any parts of the world, if they be of English parents continuing at that time as liege subjects to the King, and having done no act to forfeit the benefit of their allegiance, are ‘ipso facto’ naturalized.”"Hence the constitutionality of the restriction to father-citizens wouldn’t come into play. Blood rights would be a matter of naturalization at birth. So the “conventional wisdom” cited at the outset—the idea that there are three modes of acquiring citizenship—might be incorrect. At common law and at the time of the Constitution’s ratification, there were two modes: birth within the nation (jus soli) and naturalization (of which blood rights, or jus sanguinis, is a subset). On this view, a foreign-born child of a U.S. citizen has been naturalized at birth—but naturalized, to be sure.""But Article II doesn’t disqualify someone “naturalized at birth.” It says “natural-born citizen.” And as we have seen, at common law a foreign-born child of a father-subject is considered for “all purposes whatsoever” a natural-born subject. That should be conclusive.""Would the ancient male-only restriction disqualify a foreign-born presidential candidate whose mother alone was a U.S. citizen? Seemingly (and surprisingly) yes. The Supreme Court has never struck down on equal-protection grounds a statute that accords differential treatment for blood rights on the basis of parental gender. As recently as 1961, the Court held that an 1855 federal statute basing blood rights solely on the father’s citizenship had been valid until the statute was changed in 1934. A man born in Italy to an American mother and Italian father sought to prove he was an American citizen through his mother. Two statutes applied. One stated: “All children heretofore born or hereafter born out of the limits and jurisdiction of the United States, whose fathers were or may be at the time of their birth citizens thereof, are declared to be citizens of the United States; but the rights of citizenship shall not descend to children whose fathers never resided in the United States.” The other provided: “children of persons who now are, or have been citizens of the United States, shall, though born out of the limits and jurisdiction of the United States, be considered as citizens thereof.” The Court noted that the word “persons” could be read to include both citizen mothers and fathers. But when Congress changed the law in 1934 and extended citizenship to the foreign-born children of mothers, it expressly stated that the existing law was reversed. For this reason, the Court concluded that until then, only fathers could convey citizenship to their children. So blood rights through the male parent alone were embodied in a statute passed before the Fourteenth Amendment was ratified.""Nowhere did the Court mention the Equal Protection Clause or the Fourteenth Amendment. To some judges today, that fact suggests that the point was neither briefed nor argued, and it wasn’t considered by the Court. This might mean that the decision cannot be said to hold that such a statute doesn’t violate equal protection. The opinion was per incuriam (to use a favorite phrase of English jurists): it was written in ignorance of controlling law. But originalists would conclude quite to the contrary. They would say that the Court’s silence on the point shows that because nobody thought it might be unconstitutional, it was considered fully constitutional for a long time before and after the ratification of the Fourteenth Amendment. The eight members of the U.S. Supreme Court who joined in the 1961 opinion (all but William O. Douglas, who dissented without opinion) were no dummies. They’d have brought up equal protection if it were a pertinent point.""As things stand today, the Equal Protection Clause doesn’t forbid all gender differentiations. The fact that a federal statute to determine blood-rights citizenship clearly makes distinctions based on a parent’s gender does not necessarily make the statute unconstitutional. The current statute36 imposes a proof-of-paternity requirement on a person born out of wedlock and abroad to a citizen father and alien mother before the person can establish a blood right to citizenship. There is no similar requirement of a person born to a citizen mother.""In two cases, the Court has explained that the statute is not unconstitutional because unwed male and female parents are not similarly situated: the maternal relationship is known at birth, but the paternal relationship must be actively proved. And in 2001, the Court emphasized that Congress could reasonably require proof that a citizen parent and child had at least the opportunity to develop a relationship, which would presumably include shaping the child’s ties and allegiance to the United States. Giving birth automatically provides a mother with opportunity, but nothing assures a father of that opportunity. The Court concluded that “[f]athers and mothers are not similarly situated with regard to the proof of biological parenthood.” And “[t]o fail to acknowledge even our most basic biological differences—such as the fact that a mother must be present at birth but the father need not be—risks making the guarantee of equal protection superficial, and so disserving it.”"What is important about these more recent cases (1998, 2001) is that they analyze the differential treatment against the traditional rational-basis standard for assessing equal protection. The state must have a rational basis for its differential treatment. And ultimately the answer to what the Supreme Court would say today probably lies in that fact.""We have seen that the law in 1789 treated mother-citizens less favorably than father-citizens in conferring citizen rights when a child is born abroad. We have seen that in 1961, the Supreme Court upheld just this type of differential treatment. Was there a rational basis for the distinction? Not in the modern era of the equal-protection analysis: The only basis for the differential treatment was that we lived in a patriarchal society in which paternal lines of succession were considered more important than maternal ones. Judged by current standards of equal protection, no such discriminatory difference would be upheld by the Supreme Court today. But an originalist interpretation would almost certainly be to the contrary."Bottom Line - "All in all, it seems highly likely that the Supreme Court would today hold that the foreign-born child of a mother-citizen is eligible for the Presidency under Article II of the Constitution."</comment>

<comment>That's all irrelevant. The 1790 Naturalization Act demonstrates who is NOT a "natural born citizen" of the United States. It is an extension allowing an extra class of people to be "considered as" such. It was a temporary measure that was repealed just five years later, leaving that extra class of persons with the status of "citizen" instead.Citizenship is not what the Constitution requires to be President.That office is strictly limited to "natural born citizens" of the United States."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>It's nice to see that you are a constitutional scholar. (That's sarcasm if you do not know how to recognize it.)  But again I see you do not read and comprehend the facts of the issue arugument where the facts of the argument clearly state what defines a natural-born citizen, as opposed to what does not.Btw, just so you know, I was born overseas, and I am a natural born U.S. citizen, where my father- an Italian American U.S. citizen born and raised in NY, who enlisted in the U.S. Military was stationed overseas in Japan, where he married, and thus I was born to my mother of Japanese nationality. I have a U.S. overseas born abraid birth certitficate, and thus I am eligible, if I so desired, to run for the U.S. Presidency.I realize this is hard for you to understand, as the Atlantic article stated, the geography is the primary determining factor of a natural-born citizen, it's the blood relation of a parented U.S. citizen that which grants natural citizenship status.It makes no difference to me whether or not you agree with or disagree with the stated explained facts of definition pertaining to being a natural-born citizen or not, that's you perogative. But in so stating, I will content that the issue is deliberately muddied up for the sake of political gain reasonings.</comment>

<comment>I agree with you that the issue has been muddied up for political gain. Around 2003, the Progressives began a series of attempts to legislatively remove the requirement to be a natural born citizen for President. They were lining up Obama to be their candidate and knew he was not eligible.The definition of natural born citizen disqualifies Obama  because his Father was not a US Citizen when he was born."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of NationsAnd if you were born a citizen outside of US jurisdiction, you can't qualify to be President either. The 1790 Naturalization Act was eliminated in 1795 and you aren't that old.</comment>

<comment>Ok, but American citizens travelling abroad are still within the jurisdiction of the US even though they are simultaneously under the jurisdiction of another country. Several men on sex tours have found that out the hard way. Having sex with minors may not be against the law in Thailand, but it sure is here.So someone born from an American woman while in Canada is literally born "within" the jurisdiction of the US.</comment>

<comment>And American citizens are still taxed on their earnings overseas in any country in the world, subject to certain allowances and exceptions.</comment>

<comment>No... they are still subject to American laws, because they are American citizens, but birth in any other nation is birth under the jurisdiction of that nation and that nation's laws may encumber the child with certain citizenship requirements.Same as the child of Mexican parents born on US soil, which is under US jurisdiction, is encumbered with American laws on the subject, even though the parents are also subject to the jurisdiction and laws of their homeland.The exact definition of "natural born citizen" ensures there can be no such foreign ties for the person who would be President:"The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>What about Dred Scott (1857)? It seems to me that questions of who was a citizen were scrubbed clean after the Civil War. If the Founders had their way, then Obama could never have been President, or even a citizen.</comment>

<comment>First of all, the word is "Framers" not "Founders."The "Founders" or "Founding Fathers" are those who rebelled against Britain, declared independence, and fought for independence in the Revolutionary War. Circa 1774-1783.The "Framers" are those who drafted and enacted the Constitution, which was not ratified until 1789. Not all the same people by any means.The point of analyzing the intent of the Framers (not Founders) is to gain insight into the meaning of the Constitution as it applies today, by understanding what they intended it to mean when they adopted it. Just because some of what they wrote was later made moot (for example by the 14th Amendment as discussed in the article) doesn't make their original intent irrelevant, to the extent that original language survived the amendment. So the intent of the Framers (and the common law which existed at the time the Constitution was adopted) is relevant to the meaning of the words they chose. Likewise the intent of those who adopted the 14th Amendment should also be relevant.</comment>

<comment>Well stated.The Framers intended to prevent anyone born with foreign allegiance from bringing foreign influence into the office of President. For example, a child born an American Citizen on US soil, to a British Father, is also encumbered by British law that makes him a "natural born subject" to the King of England. That carries certain obligations to the Crown.So, they included the "natural born citizen" requirement for the Presidency to ensure such a person could never become President."The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>I just saw Ted Cruz on Fox News being critically questioned on his claim he would carpet bomb ISIS.  That was a hugely worrying announcement of what would be a genocidal war-crime.  Yet he went on to incorrectly define carpet bombing as the shock and awe mass targeted strikes in the first days of Desert Storm.  That wasn't carpet bombing. Vietnam, WWII, those are the best examples of carpet bombing but not Desert Storm.  Cruz uses tough sounding language without understanding what it means, when even my twelve year old nephew knows what it means.  Rather than that moron, would you not prefer to have my nephew as your next GOP presidential candidate?  Admittedly he also wasn't born in the USA, but his mother can do a decent american accent.</comment>

<comment>What is troubling is not the issue of natural born, but how long it took Rafael Cruz to renounce his Canadian citizenship in 2014.</comment>

<comment>This issue is pretty easy to resolve. The American Revolution and War of 1812 were fought to free Americans from British law.British Law defined who is a "natural born subject" to the King of England.Law of Nations, the reference book used by the Founders, defines who is a "natural born citizen" of a nation.WHICH of those was used in the Constitution?"The natives, or natural-born citizens, are those born in the country, of parents who are citizens." - Law of Nations</comment>

<comment>Just in case there is any doubt in anyone's mind: Canada does not want him back.</comment>

<comment>John Armor Bingham quote while speaking on  civil rights of citizens in the House on March 9, 1866:”[4] [5] [6]“[I] find no fault with the introductory clause [S 61 Bill], which is simply declaratory of what is written in the Constitution, that every human being born within the JURISDICTION of the  United States of PARENTS not owing allegiance to any foreign sovereignty is, in the language of your Constitution itself, a "NATURAL BORN CITIZEN"...”Bingham wrote the 14th amendment. He should know what the term "natural born citizen" means. To my knowledge PARENTS is plural (indicating a citizen father and mother).The 1952 Immigration and Naturalization Act allows a child born out of the United States to a U.S. citizen mother and non-U.S. citizen father to be a “citizen” of the United States at birth.Citizen and an ARTICLE II Natural Born Citizen ARE NOT THE SAME.Like Cruz or not ... this is a problem that will likely lose the nomination for him at some point.</comment>

<comment>I don't know why English law is so important to you, I don't buy it. 50 books later and in my opinion you've got nothing.  Obama is guilty of deception McCain was never eligible and Cruz needs to suck it up and go back to being a wanna be.</comment>

<comment>Ted Cruz was granted "derivative naturalization" outside the 14th Amendment by virtue of a US citizen parent.  Had he been "born in the US, and subject to the jurisdiction thereof", he would be Article II eligible, but he is not.</comment>

<comment>Derivative Citizenship“A child born in a foreign country can become a U.S. citizen if his or her parents become naturalized U.S. citizens. If the child is brought to the United States before becoming an adult, and the child's parents become citizens, then the child is entitled to claim U.S. citizenship when he or she becomes an adult. Although his or her birth certificate will still reflect a foreign-born status, a person in this situation can obtain a certificate of nationality by filing an application with the Secretary of State.” …Rights of U.S. Citizens… “A naturalized citizen has all of the rights of a native-born U.S. citizen but one: He or she can never be president of the United States. Article II of the Constitution provides: "No person except a natural-born Citizen, or a Citizen of the United States, at the time of Adoption of this Constitution, shall be eligible to the Office of President."…http://legal-dictionary.thefre...</comment>

<comment>Derivative naturalized is not natural born.Born out of the US Cruz derived US citizenship through a parent.Born in the US Trump is a natural born citizen.</comment>

<comment>Pretty poor scholarship . . .  the Indiana, Illinois, Alabama judges of cases already filed and being heard, will of course not read your trash analysis, but rather will be directed to the meaning of natural born as voted on in the Constitutional Convention in 1787 on the suggestion of the Secretary of Foreign Affairs to the convention through George Washington . . .and will also be referencing delegate Madison's Papers of May 1789 that discuss the native born rights and allegiances.Of course by USA law, Ted Cruz was naturalized by the Naturalization Act of 1952 - codified in Title 8 -as an alien born in 1970 to one US citizen-parent - a derivative dual citizenship only.The automatic citizenship Cruz' pretends to be entitled to  - I'll guess of 8 USC 1431  - is unfortunately just not available to Ted, as his father was an alien until 2005.Cruz did complete his derivative citizenship naturalization statutory requirements of 8 USC 1401 in about 1980 at age 10, so no INS deportation would be necessary in this case.The dual-citizen Ted Cruz was also ironically not entitled to any US State Department or US Embassy protection while in his native home country of Canada, until he renounced the citizenship of Canada Citizen Birth Record ID No. 70-08-032264, one Rafael E. Cruz, Jr. - mother maiden name Darragh.An INS hearing can also require the blood tests of both to confirm the parentage of the alien born, allegedly to one US citizen parent . . . as the USA shall not want to rely on a foreign nation's birth records for this important naturalization verification.</comment>

<comment>Here is a much better article with settled Supreme Court case references. If Ted Cruz went to court on the eligibility issue, the court has already determined in cases exactly like his, that he is a naturalized citizen. http://www.thepostemail.com/20...</comment>

